Jacques De Saussure's House - Virtual Globetrotting
Virtual GlobetrottingSign In
                            or
                            Create an Account
                            to
                            Submit MapsBrowse MapsBy SourceGoogle MapsGoogle Maps Street ViewBing MapsBing Maps Birds Eye ViewSorted ByMost PopularTop RatedLatestTitle
                                    BuildingsBuildingsCastlesColleges / UniversitiesFamous ArchitectsFamous HomesHistoric HomesPalacesPrisonsSkyscrapersMore…StructuresAncientBridgesDomesIndianLandmarksMemorialsMonumentsTowersMore…EntertainmentAmphitheatresCarnivalsCasinosCircusDiningRoadside AttractionsTheme ParksWater ParksMore…SportsBaseball Fields (Pro)Baseball Fields (Other)BasketballFootball (Pro)Football (College)Hockey ArenasTennis StadiumsSoccer StadiumsMore…MilitaryMilitary BasesMilitary Air FieldsNavy / Coast GuardMilitary CommunicationsMissile SitesRadar SitesCovertCensored ImageryMore…TransportationAir PortsAutomotiveDrydocksHarborsLighthousesPiersRailSpaceportsMore…
                                    CelebsEntertainmentActorsMusiciansOther…BusinessBusinessGovernment & PoliticiansOther…SportsAuto RacingBaseballBasketballFootballGolfIce HockeySoccerTennisOther…
                                    Street ViewArtAdvertising / SignsGraffitiMuralsPaintingsSculptureMore…BuildingsCastlesGovernmentMuseumsNovelty / InterestingRetail / DiningMore…EntertainmentRoadside AttractionsStreet TheaterTheme Parks / Circuses / FairsRandom ObjectsOther…EventsConstructionFires / Crashes / DisastersHistoricalPeople Doing ThingsOther…NatureBirds / AnimalsParks / PlaygroundsScenicWeatherOther…VehiclesAirplanesCars / TrucksFire / Police / AmbulanceMilitary (Active)Military (On Display)More…
                                    OtherEventsAbandonedAccidentsIn The NewsMilitaryMovie LocationsMurder SitesOlympic SitesTV LocationsMore…LandArtwork - SculptureArtwork - Land ArtGolf CoursesMazesParksPollutionRacewaysZoosMore…NaturalGeographic ExtremesIslandsLakesMountainsParksRiversVolcanoesWaterfallsMore…TransportationAir - ClassicAir - Fighter JetsBoneyardsCruise ShipsFerriesRailShipwrecksSubmarinesMore…WorldUSJacques De SaussureJacques De Saussure's HouseMaps/Jacques De Saussure's House  Info 



Like





Tweet





+1





Pin





Talk







×
                    This map's location has been removed for privacy concerns.
                  


 
             Google Maps No Thumbnail 
             Bing Maps  






                    By Xeba73 @ 2013-01-29 03:14:25                









De Saussure is a Senior Partner at Pictet & Cie, one of Switzerland's largest private banks, with assets under management and custody totalling USD 397 billion.

                    Links: www.group.pictet 


                        216 views
                    
 

                    Unrated 



 

Categories

Buildings > Residential 







Comments

Policies

                        Please log in if you don't want to post
                        anonymously (anonymous users cannot post links)
                    

Your Name





Comment






Please enter the Anti-Spam code  Reload 












 



Similar Maps: Residential 


                Share:
            

 + My Favorites  Email 




Comments

Policies

                        Please log in if you don't want to post
                        anonymously (anonymous users cannot post links)
                    

Your Name





Comment






Please enter the Anti-Spam code  Reload 









 






Jacques De Saussure: Executive Profile & Biography - Bloomberg









































  





















































































July 28, 2017 2:03 PM ET
Capital Markets

Company Overview of Banque Pictet & Cie SA



SnapshotPeople 




OverviewBoard MembersCommittees



Executive Profile
Jacques   De Saussure  Senior Managing Partner, Banque Pictet & Cie SAAgeTotal Calculated CompensationThis person is connected to 1 Board Members in 1 different organizations across 6 different industries.See Board Relationships65--
Background

		Mr. Jacques De Saussure has been Senior Managing Partner of Pictet Group since July 2010. Mr. De Saussure served as Managing Partner of Pictet Group, Banquiers. Mr. De Saussure joined Pictet in 1980 and entered the partnership in 1987. Mr. De Saussure has been Chairman and Director of EuroSite Power Inc. since July 1, 2016. He served as the Chairman of SIX Swiss Exchange Ltd. He served as Vice Chairman of SIX Swiss Exchange Ltd. and SIX Group Ltd. He served as a Member ... of Supervisory Board at Eurex Clearing AG. He served as a Director of SIX Group Ltd. since May 1999. He served as a Director of SWX Europe Limited and SWX Europe Holdings Limited. He holds a Master's Degree from MIT. He attended the Swiss Federal Institute of Technology (EPFL) and graduated with a degree in Applied Mathematics and Computer Science in 1975 before going on to obtain a Master's Degree from MIT'sSloan School of Management in 1978.Read Full Background




Corporate Headquarters
Route des Acacias 60Geneva, Geneva 1211SwitzerlandPhone: 41 58 323 23 23Fax: 41 58 323 23 24
Board Members Memberships
2016-PresentChairmanEuroSite Power Inc.
Education
Unknown/Other Education 1975Eidgenössische Technische Hochschule ZürichMaster's Degree Massachusetts Institute of Technology
Other Affiliations
SWX Europe Holdings LimitedEidgenössische Technische Hochschule ZürichMassachusetts Institute of TechnologySIX Swiss Exchange LtdEurex Clearing AGSIX Group AGSWX Europe LimitedEuroSite Power Inc.


Annual Compensation
				There is no Annual Compensation data available.
				Stocks Options
				There is no Stock Options data available.
				Total Compensation
				There is no Total Compensation data available.
			



Request Profile Update
















 












The information and data displayed in this profile are created and managed by S&P Global Market Intelligence, a division of S&P Global. Bloomberg.com does not create or control the content. For inquiries, please contact S&P Global Market Intelligence directly by clicking 
	here.




Stock Quotes


Market data is delayed at least 15 minutes.







Company Lookup



COMPETITOR COMPENSATIONThere is no Competitor Compensation data available.










Sponsored Financial Commentaries

Sponsored Links






Browse Companies
A
B
C
D
E
F
G
H
I
J
K
L
M
N
O
P
Q
R
S
T
U
V
W
X
Y
Z
 | 
0
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9






Request Profile Update

						Only a company representative may request an update for the company profile. Documentation will be required.
					  
To contact Banque Pictet & Cie SA, please visit .  Company data is provided by S&P Global Market Intelligence.  Please use this form to report any data issues.
					  


Information Missing - Please enter your information in the following field(s): 




Company Name

Your Name*

Your E-Mail Address*

Your Phone Number*

Type of Data*


Overview
Executives
Key developments
Similar companies
Transactions


Update Needed*

All data changes require verification from public sources.  Please include the correct value or values and a source where we can verify.


Cancel


Submit






Your requested update has been submitted
Our data partners will research the update request and update the information on this page if necessary. Research and follow-up could take several weeks. If you have questions, you can contact them at bwwebmaster@businessweek.com.


Close




























Norman N. Holland, The Trouble(s) with Lacan



The Trouble(s) with Lacan


Norman N. Holland

© Copyright 1998, Norman N. Holland, all rights
reserved


    I can be quite blunt about it.  There are three major troubles with Lacan: his linguistics, his psycholinguistics, and his idea of child development.  Let me take them one by one.

I
    Lacan's most widely quoted maxim is, The unconscious is structured like a language, and like that sentence, Lacan's whole oeuvre rests on a certain idea of language.  His proclaimed "return to Freud" meant remedying Freud's failure to use "modern" linguistics. "Modern" linguistics for Lacan, however, means turn-of-the-century linguistics---specifically, Ferdinand de Saussure's.  The trouble is that very little of Saussure's linguistics stands up today, after nearly a century's work in linguistics.1

For one thing, Saussure bases his theory on a division of language into langue and parole. Langue is the formal system of signs which is the way he imagines language, and parole is people's actual speaking.  The problem is that langue is not a real thing, but some Platonic ideal.2 Parole we see all around us, but how would you define "English" or "French" or "Black English"?  It is simply a construct, quite arbitrary, like trying to define what is American or un-American.  And like such notions, it is subject to unpleasant sociopolitical uses, particularly in such cases as Black English.  You could define English langue as the rules by which we make English sounds and sentences, including lexicon rules, but then you are playing an altogether different linguistic game.  You have gone far beyond Saussure into Chomskyan ideas of competence.  Those rules we can indeed define, and they are real, as real as viruses or electrons.  But that is not Saussure and not Lacan.

    Saussure (and therefore Lacan) presents a second linguistic problem: signifiers and signifieds.  For Saussure, language consists of signifiers signifying signifieds.  For Saussure, signifier and signified are bound together in the sign, and a language consists of all its signs. Signifiers and signifieds he says, are defined by what they are not, by difference.  That is, the sign tree is what it is because it is different from free, it is not three, not true, and so on.  Its signified, the concept of a tree, is not the concept of a bush, not a vine, different from the concept of a flower.  In short, the sign is what it is because it is not any of the millions of other signs our language affords. Saussure therefore imaged language as a vast piece of paper with all the signifiers on one surface and all the signifieds on the other.  As you cut the paper, marking these differences between one signifier and another, one isolate particular signifier-signified pairs or signs.

    In effect, Saussure says language equals the dictionary as though I could understand French by memorizing Larousse or, in Saussure's more sophisticated version, by memorizing all the binary polarities for all the words in the Larousse dictionary.  Indeed, Saussure says as much: "Language exists in the form of a sum of impressions deposited in the brain of each member of a community, almost like a dictionary of which identical copies have been distributed to each individual."3  I think that is a very primitive conception of language, reasonable for the 1890s but not for the 1990s.  It is a conception of language that really works at best for proper or common nouns, like Saussure's examples, tree and horse or for tightly codified terms, like Lacan's cute example of the paired doors with Men and Women on them.  But what do you do with abstract words? What "signified" comes to your mind when I say "hope"?  Do you think it could be expressed as a system of differences as easily as the system of differences that defines the sound "hope"?   What do you do with open verbs like "go," "do," or prepositions like "in" or "on," the kind of words whose "signifieds" go on for page after page in the OED?

    I say this dictionary version of language "works at best" for common nouns, but this is a very weak and inadequate view of even the individual word.  Let me give you an example.  I can say,


I persuaded John's mother that John should go to college.

I can say

I persuaded John's mother.

But I shouldn't say

* I persuaded that John should go to college.

It's not grammatical.  Why?  Because it is a property of the verb persuade that it takes a noun phrase as object plus a noun clause (or some reduction of a noun clause). It cannot take the noun clause unless the noun phrase is also there.  This is a marking of the verb persuade and this marking has to be in the lexicon for us to make sentences with that verb.

    Similarly, you can say

I asked what time it was.

Or you can say,

I wondered what time it was.

You can say,

I asked the time.

But it's not grammatical to say,

* I wondered the time.

You can say,

It was asked what time it was.

But you shouldn't say,

* It was wondered what time it was.

This is another case where the verbs ask and wonder must have markings to indicate whether they can be made passive or whether they can take a simple noun phrase as object.  You can see a primitive form of this marking when our ordinary dictionaries mark a verb as transitive or intransitive or a noun as a proper noun.  But Saussure doesn't even get to that level.

    There are many other problems with Saussure's linguistics.  How can such a model as Saussure's account for the constant change in language?  When contragate entered our political vocabulary, did it readjust all the billions of patterns of difference from aal to zyxt?  How can you use Saussure's linguistics to explain ambiguity? "The old men and women."  Does that mean old men and the old women or the old men and all the women?  "The shooting of the hunters was terrible."  Are we talking about a tragedy or were the deer lucky?  "John hit the ball, then Herbert."  Did Herbert come to bat or to grief?  Does Saussure's linguistics help at all with these questions?

    In general, how can Saussure's dictionary conception of language model the way we combine words into sentences?  How does it explain your ability to understand a sentence you have never heard before? Indeed, using Saussure, how do you deal with sentences at all?  How do you deal with the fact that even very young children can create complicated sentences they have never heard before?  And they can understand complex sentences they have never heard before.  How can you account for these facts using only signifiers and signifieds, already shaky as concepts even at the level of single words?

    You may well recognize those last questions.  I am simply asking the same questions that Noam Chomsky asked about phrasestructure grammars thirty years ago.  It was he who in 1957 finally refuted Saussure and the structural linguistics that developed from Saussure. Chomsky turned linguistics to what what he calls the real and much harder problems, for example, What constitutes knowledge of a language?

    Notice how Chomsky has focused on language as a psychological phenomenon.  By contrast, Saussure treats language as a phenomenon "out there" in some sort of Platonic space, apart from the humans who use it.

    Saussure built his linguistics on the unit of the word.  One part of Chomsky's 1957 revolution in linguistics was to change that unit of analysis to the sentence.  He made his well-known demand, that a grammar should be able to generate all and only the well-formed sentences of a language.  Saussure does not even come close to this target.

    Long before Chomsky, however, linguists realized that it would take something more than Saussure's linguistics to interrelate words in phrases and sentences.  As it happens, some nineteenth century linguists, Hermann Paul, Karl Brugmann, and William Dwight Whitney, experimented with the idea of deep structures.  Saussure knew of their work, and there is at least one passage in students' notes on Saussure's lectures where he seems himself (under the influence of Whitney) to adopt the idea.4  In his Cours, however, he insists, as we have seen, on confining himself to the linguistic surface.  Hence he was able to offer only a very primitive way of explaining how we put words together to form sentences.

    I find Saussure's idea of a sentence difficult to grasp.5
He seems to conclude that one builds sentences along "two natural co- ordinates": association and syntagms.  Association groups words (or inflections or any morpheme, really) according to meanings.  Associations determine what is possible at any given slot in the sentence.  He defined the "syntagm" as consecutive signifier-signified units.  Syntagmatics arranges elements in linear order, thereby creating slots, but one cannot (according to Saussure) study word order apart from its concrete manifestations.   That is, one cannot consider the slots apart from the words that actually fill them. "To think that there is an incorporeal syntax outside material units distributed in space would be a mistake."6  Thus he rules deep structure out in favor of the supposed reality of the mythical entity called "English" or "French."  He rules out the very possibility of deep structure.

    Furthermore, the only syntagms in langue, he proclaimed, were pat phrases dictated by tradition, things like Good morning or il y a.  Once a language fact depends on individual freedom, we are in the realm of parole, and for him, "The sentence . . . . belongs to speaking [parole], not to language [langue]."7  Hence sentences are beyond his scope.

    Chomsky sums Saussure's system up this way: "In Saussurean structuralism, a language (langue) was taken to be a system of sounds and an associated system of concepts; the notion of sentence was left in a kind of limbo, perhaps to be accommodated within the study of language use."  "Saussurean structuralism had placed . , . `free expressions' outside of the scope of the study of language structure, of Saussure's langue."  As a result, "The fundamental question of the use and understanding of new sentences is left without any explanation."8
    Lacan apparently tried to deal with the problem of sentences in Saussure by adding to Saussure a linguistic idea of Roman Jakobson's.  Enlarging on Saussure's brief and inconclusive remarks, Jakobson helped out with two principles to account for sentences.  It is obvious that we make sentences by putting one word after another.  First, "The man."  Then "hit."  Then "the."  Then "ball."  It is equally obvious that at any given point in that process we can substitute other words.  Instead of "The man," we could say "The woman," or "Herbert."  Instead of "ball," we could substitute other nouns or phrases to produce, "The man hit the child," or "The man hit the nail on the head," or "The man hit the road."  Jakobson thus formalized Saussure's two-axis model of sentence formation.  Following Saussure, he named these two principles the paradigmatic (the vertical axis of selection) and the syntagmatic (the horizontal axis of sequential combination)."  At other times Jakobson called the paradigmatic axis of section metaphor and the syntagmatic axis of sequential combination metonymy.  Then Lacan approximated Jakobson's metonymy (roughly, sequence) and metaphor (roughly, substitution) to Freud's "condensation" and "displacement," and in turn to other linguists' "syntagm" and "paradigm."

    Jakobson was a distinguished linguist, but he developed these particular ideas before Chomsky's 1957 revolution in linguistics.  Chomsky replaced Jakobson's metaphor and metonymy with a far subtler system of transformations of kernel sentences, a system that Chomsky himself and many other linguists have still further sophisticated.

    Lacan, however, stuck with Jakobson, even when writing long after 1957.  Lacan seems to have preferred  simple two-valued systems.  That is, we have but two items, metaphor and metonymy, with which to account for sentence production.  We have but signifier and signified to account for language.  And we have but conscious and unconscious to model the mind.

    Be that as it may, Jakobson's system doesn't account for the way we build sentences any more than Saussure's.  Jakobson and Saussure are describing what Chomsky calls a "finite-state grammar."  In such a grammar, "Sentences are generated by means of a series of choices made `from left to right'; that is to say, after the first, or leftmost element has been selected, [the probability of] every subsequent choice is determined by the immediately preceding elements."9   Chomsky showed in 1957 that none of these could in principle account for sentence production.  That is, none could account for a sentence in which the selection of one element depends on the presence or absence of another element elsewhere in the sentence.

    Consider the pair of sentences in Chomsky's well- known example:


John is eager to please.

John is easy to please.

At first glance, they look as though they were built along Jakobsonian lines. Just substitute "eager" for "easy."  But the underlying meanings are quite different.  In the first sentence, John is active, in the second, passive.  In the first John is doing things, in the second John is being done for.  But in the linguistic world of Saussure, Jakobson, and Lacan, the only difference between those two sentences is the difference between "eager" and "easy.

    There are still more complex examples (studied in the later phases of Chomsky's work).  The point is that identical phrasings can have quite different meanings depending on what comes before or after:

John is too angry to talk to Bill.

John is too angry to talk to.

In one case, John is doing the talking, in the other, someone other than John, so that the seven signifiers, is too angry to talk to mean quite different things.  In other words, a given signifier can mean different things depending on other elements in the sentence.  Similarly,

I wonder who the hunters expected to see them.

I wonder who the hunters expected to see.

In the first sentence, the hunters are seen.  In the second, they do the seeing.

The horse raced round the barn.

The horse raced round the barn fell.

In the first sentence, the horse did the racing.  In the second, someone else did.

    There is no need to belabor the point.  When we compose or understand sentences we use structures that deal with more than the surface produced.  We use rules in which the choice of words in one part of a sentence is dictated by the choice of words in an earlier or later part. Furthermore, these structures can be exceedingly complex.  I would find it quite impossible to say for the hunters sentences how I know that the first "them" refers to the hunters themselves.

    Saussure did not recognize that any formal account of language strong enough to deal with sentences and discourse (to say nothing of a psychological account of humans using language) has to include more systems than just a lexicon.  It also (and most importantly) has to include the interactions among these different systems.  Saussure's account of language deals only with surface features and makes no provision for deep structures or transformations between deep and surface structures.  Saussure has no way, for example, of declaring any sentence grammatical or non- grammatical. However a language is structured, it is not structured the way Saussure says it is, nor do Jakobson's metonymy and metaphor take us further.

    That is the first "trouble with Lacan."  Lacan goes wrong by relying (quite uncritically!) on Saussure's signifier-signified conception of language.  It is understandable that Lacan, when he began to write in the 1930s, should learn Saussure's turn-of-the-century linguistics. But even at the end of his life he and now his followers write about signifiers and signifieds as though the Chomskyan revolution in linguistics had never happened.  Contemporary literary theorists tirelessly quote Saussure.  But why?  Today's linguists no more use Saussure's model than today's physicists use the concept of phlogiston.

    I do not mean to suggest that linguists have all adopted Chomsky's views.  They are still controversial, and he would be the first to acknowledge that they are subject to revision in the light of further evidence.  Linguists who reject Chomsky's ideas, however, are trying to offer alternatives or to go beyond Chomsky.  They are not turning back to Saussure. My point is not that Chomsky is right but that Saussure and Lacan are wrong.

    Chomsky is not being unduly harsh when he calls Saussure's linguistics an "impoverished and thoroughly inadequate conception of language," at best adequate for its time but finally leading to unimportant research and feedback.10  A theory (like Saussure's) that language understanding is purely semantic, reports Mitchell Marcus, is "fundamentally inadequate to process the full range of natural language" and "held by no current researchers, to my knowledge."11  In writing this essay,  for example, I had trouble finding linguistic texts that even refer to Saussure. Saussure's views are not held, so far as I know, by modern linguists, only by literary critics, Lacanians, and the occasional philosopher.  "Wrong on a grand scale," cognitive linguist Mark Turner calls it them.12  And it has elicited wrong film and literary theory on a grand scale.  One can find dozens of books of literary theory bogged down in signifiers and signifieds, but only a handful that even mention Chomsky.

    It will be said---it has been said to me by Lacanian friends---that this objection to Lacan, that he uses a mistaken and outmoded linguistics, does not count because Lacan only uses Saussure for his own psychological purposes.  Saussure is only a metaphor in Lacan's thinking. Lacan brought him in to establish himself in the Parisian intellectual community.

    I find this justification unconvincing for two reasons.  First, it does not fit our use of metaphor.  When we use a metaphor to understand somethng, we use something we understand well to understand something we understand less well.  We take an idea from a well-understood "source domain" to understand a more puzzling "target domain."  If I say life is a journey, I use something I am familiar with and understand quite well, journeys, to understand something more mysterious, life.  I can then model difficulties in my life as obstacles in the path or choices as forks in road, and so on.  Even so simple a metaphor can become quite sophisticated, as in Robert Frost's well-known lines,

Two roads diverged in a wood, and I ---
I took the one less traveled by,
And that has made all the difference.

But this is not what Lacan does when he uses Saussure.  He uses a still- mysterious subject, language, to understand a subject that Freud and many others have made understandable, namely, unconscious processes.  Rather than clarify an opacity in psychoanalysis, he has made it more opaque and arcane. It would be strange indeed to claim that Lacan explains things clearly.

    Furthermore, his account of his source domain, language, is wrong.  What happens to our use of metaphor to explore an unknown if the source term is an error or an illusion?  For example, suppose our original notion of journeys was that they all take place in elevators, up and down, not across roads toward destinations.  What happens then even to a familiar metaphor like life is a journey?  It stops making sense.  Ideas of crossroads or forks in the road or obstacles cannot help us understand life at all.  The same is true of Lacan's use of Saussure: it does not help us understand unconscious processes at all---or at least no better than Freud's and others' direct accounts.

It has also been said to me, particularly by French analysts, that now Lacan has been "passed," that Lacan is only important and in that he bought France to an awareness of psychoanalysis.  He could not have done so except by using Saussure and the structural linguistics popular when Lacan began to make a difference in French intellectual life.  I find this justification as odd as the other.  Are we to take Lacan seriously as thinker because he is a popularizer?  Further, to what kind of psychoanalysis has he led French psychoanalysts, some French psychoanalysts, that is?  To a psychoanalysis that is more philosophy than psychology.  To abstract and metaphysical reasoning far removed from clinical experience.  And that brings me to Lacan's second trouble, his psycholinguistics.
II
    Lacan presents psycholinguistic problems as well as linguistic.  Even if Chomsky were all wrong, Lacan has made a still more fundamental error in psychologizing Saussure's account of language.  Over and over again, Lacan claims that linguistic entities are in fact psychological entities.

The most notorious instance where he converts a linguistic entity to a psychological one is, of course, signifier and signified. Lacan identifies the signifier pretty with the conscious and Saussure's signified with Freud's unconscious.  Then the linguistic barre that Saussure posited between signifier and signified, Lacan equates to Freud's repression.

    As we have seen, Lacan approximates Jakobson's metonymy (roughly, sequence) and Jakobson's metaphor (roughly, substitution) to Freud's "condensation" and "displacement," and in turn to other linguists' "syntagm" and "paradigm."  In other words, what he does is say that these linguistic entitities are in fact psychological entities.

    Similarly, the barre Saussure posited between signifier and signified comes to equal Freud's repression.  The linguist's barre becomes the psychoanalyst's bar between conscious and unconscious, and the signifier cannot cross it.  The hidden signifieds are the unconscious, and the signifiers are the "empty speech" with which we try to express, as in free associations, our real (unconscious) selves.  We necessarily fail, because signifiers signify other signifiers, not signifieds. Conscious and unconscious are thus opposed in one of Lacan's two-valued systems.

    In effect, Lacan renders all psychic determinism as the single linguistic process of a signifier signifying other signifiers. That's quite a role for a process that modern linguists doubt even exists.

    The major place where Lacan converts a linguistic entity to a psychological one is, of course, with signifier and signified. Lacan  identifies the signifier pretty closely with the conscious and Saussure's signified with Freud's unconscious.  Then he modifies Saussure with what he regards as the essence of Freud's discoveries, the barre which equals repression and marks off conscious from unconscious..
"Écrits," write Benvenuto and Kennedy of Lacan's cornerstone book, "is fundamentally concerned with the laws of the signifier."13 The essence of Freud's discovery is, Lacan himself writes,

that the displacement of the signifier determines the subjects in their acts, in their destiny, in their refusals, their blind spots, their end and fate, their innate gifts and social acquisitions . , . without regard for character or sex, and that, willingly or not, everything that might be considered the stuff of psychology, kit and caboodle, will follow the path of the signifier.
14
In effect, Lacan renders all psychic determinism as the single linguistic process of signification.  That's quite a role for a process that modern linguists doubt even exists!

    What is fascinating to me about this maneuver is that it exactly reverses the assumption that Saussure had to make when he set out to build his linguistics.  Saussure knew that a psychological account of our use of language was beyond him or anybody else in the 1890s. He sensibly chose to ignore the human element.  Anyway, he wanted to develop a formal account of language, to give "language first place in the study of speech."15  As Saussure tells us at the beginning and end of his lectures, his aim was to free linguistics from ethnography, social or individual psychology, physiology, philology, and everything else that is not linguistics.  He wanted to model language in purely linguistic terms.  "The true and unique object of linguistics is language studied in and for itself."16  "From the very outset we must put both feet on the ground of language [le terrain de la langue] and use language as the norm of all other manifestations of speech."17 He wanted a linguistics that would account for language strictly as language, that would have nothing to do with the way real people use language.

    He simply and briefly assumed an associationist psychology which was adequate for his purposes: "the psychological association of the [sound-]image with the corresponding concept."18  He just posited "signifying."  Somehow, physical sounds or differences in physical sounds convert into psychological concepts or differences in psychological concepts it doesn't matter how.  Signifiers simply evoke signifieds automatically.  A given (difference in) sound "imprints" a certain arbitrarily connected (difference in) sense.  Meaning thus becomes meaning-out-there, in language (wherever that is), not meaning-in-here, in our minds.  Then, once Saussure had bracketed the human element, he could go on to develop his purely formal account of language. The assumption enabled him to found structural linguistics, but it has no psychological credibility at all.

    Saussure deliberately dropped out the human element,  In Saussure's model, a signifier's difference from other signifiers simply imprints a difference from other ideas in the hearer's mind, and this is where Saussure thinks he eludes psychology.  He has only swept it under the rug, though, hiding the psychological process in the word "imprints." Saussure's "signifying," far from being something the theorist of literature or film can take for granted, rests on a highly questionable but unexamined set of psychological premises.

    Chomsky notes, as I do, the links between behaviorist psychology and this "structural linguistics."  Both structural linguistics and behaviorist psychology avoid the notion of the active or autonomous individual in favor of a subject subject to linguistic laws or stimulus-response laws.  In 1964, Chomsky correctly identified (as I am doing) the structural linguistics that derives from Saussure as "radical behaviorist reductionism."19  It is an extreme stimulus-response, behaviorist picture of the mind that among psychologists, even the most devout of Skinnerians might not endorse.

    Now comes Lacan and confuses matters further. Saussure was trying to de-psychologize linguistics.  But Lacan re- psychologizes Saussure's linguistics.  Lacan is using a formal theory of language to explain empirical events in the mind.  Saussure was trying precisely not to say what goes on in your or my mind when we understand a word or make up a sentence, and, within the limits of his theory, he succeeded.  Lacan, however, applies Saussure's carefully apsychological theory to describe precisely what it avoided describing.


     To be sure, Lacan radically changes Saussure. Lacan changes the signifiers-signified relation.  For him, signifiers do not point to signifieds but to other signifiers.  But what Lacan does not change is the principle that signifiers signify.  That remains axiomatic.  Lacan retains the basic idea that the signifier does things.

    In Lacanian psychoanalysis the structuralists' behaviorist notion of signification still prevails.  Its inventor, Saussure, never meant it to be a psychological process, and modern linguists no longer take it seriously.  Nevertheless, Lacan substitutes signification for association, memory, learning, and ultimately all other psychological processes.  The chain of signifiers, running along according to its own laws, determines the I, and the determinism is total, says Lacan.  What results is a psychoanalysis which is really, underneath, a stimulus-response behaviorism. Lacan by combining Saussure's linguistics with Freud makes Freud into the 1890s psychologies that Saussure had sense enough to avoid.

    When Saussure (or Lacan following him) equates a formal description of language to the psychology of language-users, he makes the entailings of formal linguistics into stimulus-response in the mind.  It is easy to see what has gone wrong if we consider arithmetic instead of language.  In a formal sense, adding one to the first number "generates" all the rest of the integers.  Yes, in a purely formal way,

n+1, (n+1)+1, ((n+1)+1)+1, . , .

"signifies" all the whole, positive numbers.  But that "generates" or "signifies" does not describe what goes on in your mind or mine when we count 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, . . .  Presenting ((n+1)+1)+1 to us does not stimulate the set of integral numbers in our minds.

    Neither does tree stimulate a concept of a tree.  The process of understanding language is far more complex.  Chomsky followed his 1957 rebuttal of phrase-structure grammars in Syntactic Structures with a devastating review in 1959 of B. F. Skinner's Verbal Behavior, a book that attempted to explain human language skills in behaviorist terms.  In both instances, Chomsky showed that it is both logically and empirically impossible to account for language proficiency in terms of stimulus-response chains.  Yet that is just what Lacan assumes.

    Saussure formalized language as a sheet of signifying differences mapped onto a sheet of signified differences.  Whatever its linguistic credibility (and that is very limited in 1990), this idea of signifying entails a radically behaviorist, stimulus-response psychology of language.

    Despite the claims of a "return to Freud" and the psychoanalytic subject-matter, Lacan, by re-psychologizing Saussure, posits a linguistic stimulus-response of the most radical kind. In other words, Lacan assumes that language combines and recombines itself apart from the speaking subject.  Whatever his other changes from Saussure, he keeps the premise that words are the active ones in the psychological or, more precisely, the psycholinguistic process.  It is language that means, not readers or hearers who make meaning.    The chain of signifiers, running along according to its own laws, determines the I, and the determinism is total, says Lacan.  Or perhaps we should call it, as Raymond Tallis does, "the dance of signifiers," the "Lacan-can."20
    Not only does Lacan's claim make the philosophical error of using Saussure's formal description of language psychology as if it were an empirical one, he is also wrong on empirical grounds.  That is, I cannot think of a serious psycholinguist who would agree with Saussure's or Lacan's account of the way we understand language.

    Indeed, today's cognitive science shows the opposite.  Words do not simply imprint meanings on our minds, as Saussure thought.  Words require considerable processing, for example, through schemata and feedback loops.  Any elementary textbook in the psychology of reading or the psychology of language would make this clear.21  The only justification for Saussure's and Lacan's idea that signifiers impose themselves on persons is the apparently compelling need of some intellectuals to feel that the individual is not autonomous.  Their account is simply and unequivocally false by today's standards.

    For one thing, it is too simple.  Where our knowledge of the architecture and chemistry of the brain would suggest continuum and flow and feedback, Lacan substitutes abrupt discontinuities, simple yes-nos.  Where both-and makes sense, Lacan substitutes either-or and becomes able to write paradoxes.  The paradoxes result from Lacan's replacing a more complex, systems model language with Saussure's two-valued account  of language as differences in signifiers signifying differences in signifieds. It is Saussure's barre which justifies Lacan's idea of the split and alienated self.  But the barre is not a good linguistic concept, and psychologists, psychoanalysts, and psycholinguists do not regard the self as split.

    Rather, it is clear to me that Lacan's insistence on a split and self-alientated self contradicts an experience familiar to anyone in analysis.  One of the things you learn on the couch is that your ordinary, conscious activities express and partially fulfill deep, early, and unconscious wishes.

    It is precisely that experience that Lacan denies. In doing so, he claims to be rescuing psychoanalysis from the ego psychologists, whom he portrays as preaching adaptation to society and fleeing the subversive truths discovered by Freud a. (That is, Lacan misreads Heinz Hartmann's biological concept of adaptation as a social one.)  But in fact, what Lacan has done is convert Freud's complex truths into a simple yes-no, on-off, binary system.  He has left no place for sublimation.

    To be sure, Saussure's all-or-nothing, sound- concept dichotomies have a certain modish appeal.  They are certainly easier to understand than Chomsky's and post-Chomskyan models.  But they are no substitute for the human element in explaining how we create and understand language.  They lead to a false psychology and a false psychoanalysis.

    When Lacan gives to Saussure's formal model of language a psychological validity, Lacan builds his thinking on the idea of a self-running language.  Finally that renders his thought profoundly anti- psychoanalytic.
III
    I have concentrated on Lacan's use of the false and outmoded linguistics of Saussure, because it seems to me central to his system.  Similar problems attach to another fundamental Lacanian concept: "the mirror stage."22  As a concept it is analogous to self-object differentiation in ordinary psychoanalysis.  In ordinary psychoanalysis, though, self-object differentiation leaves the child with an identity, while in Lacan it leaves the child with a basic "lack of being."

    The child, says Lacan, identifies with its mirror image---and Lacan insists on an actual mirror, not some "mirroring behavior" from a parent.  That is how the child forms an ego (the illusion of autonomy). Lacan claims a uniform or continuing process from six to eighteen months.  He claims that throughout these twelve months the infant can recognize his own image any time in that period as such.  That is to say, the infant recognizes that the image in the mirror is an image of the infant himself. Lacan then goes on to claim that the infant makes a judgment, namely that this image is unified, coherent, more so than the infant.  The infant believes that he is capable of controlling it.  Finally, Lacan claims that the infant recognizes the image and makes these judgment before speech.  Lacan writes of "This jubilant assumption of his specular image by the child at the infans stage, still sunk in his motor incapacity and nursling dependence . , .  The I is precipitated in a primordial form, before . , . language restores to it . , . its function as subject."

    But what is the evidence for such a mirror stage? As usual, Lacan pays precious little attention to evidence.  He mentions neither experimental evidence nor clinical material.  Instead he cites a 1925 book by Wolfgang Köhler on the behavior of chimpanzees.  He refers, without telling you what it is, to James Mark Baldwin's book on child development from 1903.

    Now this may be reasonable for Lacan.  After all, he was inventing the mirror stage in 1936, and he may not have had access to any better data.  But what about Lacanians of today?  I have yet to see a Lacanian refer to the careful videotapes of infant behavior by Daniel Stern?23  Or Margaret Mahler's direct observation of nine infants' behavior with mirrors?24  Or indeed, the score or more of articles on infants' behavior in front of mirrors that even a cursory search of Psychological Abstracts turns up?25
    When we look at these more sophisticated studies, we find that there is no evidence whatsoever for Lacan's notion of a mirror stage.  What we find is that infants' behavior in front of mirrors is not a uniform process during the period from six to eighteen months, as Lacan claims.  It is true that children uniformly show pleasure in playing with and responding to their own mirror images throughout the period from three to twenty-four months.  What they respond pleasurably to is what is called "contingent behavior."  That is, the child can make the image in the mirror move, the same way it can swat a mobile over its crib and make it move. Children enjoy demonstrating that kind of power.  At age eight to nine months, the infant uses mirrors to reach for objects, for other people, and for itself. That is, the infant realizes that the image is an image, and it has some sense of the geometry of reflection.  According to Margaret Mahler's observations, from twelve to eighteen months, chldren identify the image as itself by pointing, naming, or by saying the personal pronoun.  In the more precise experiments by Jeanne Brooks-Gunn and Michael Lewis(Lewis, Brooks 1985)(Lewis, Brooks-Gunn, Jaskir 1985), using rouge spots surreptitiously placed on the face, by fifteen months and not before, children begin to identify the image in the mirror as themselves, and they begin to exhibit self-conscious behavior.  They pose, for example.  They do not show the jubiliation Lacan claims.  In sum, up to fifteen months, no children pass the rouge test, and by twenty-four months, all normal children have passed the rouge test.  There is, by the way, a similar sequence of behaviors for children seeing themselves on video monitors or in videotapes, but slower.

    This is quite a different picture from Lacan.  By the time children can recognize their mirror images as themselves, most of them have already started using language.  Children seem nervous and self- conscious in front of this recognized image, not jubilant as Lacan claims. There is no sign that the child makes a judgment that this image is unified or in some sense more powerful or otherwise different from self.  Indeed, how could there be a sign of such a thing?  What the child is finding out is that the image in fact reflects the self.

    In short, there is no evidence for Lacan's notion of a mirror stage.  Indeed what evidence we have runs rather the other way. As I say, perhaps Lacan knew no better in 1936, but why do present-day Lacanians go on quoting this mish-mash of conjecture and false assertions?

    The same objection applies to Lacan's linguisterie.  Why do Lacanians keep on talking about signifiers and signifieds and the system erected upon them?  A simple look at the Encyclopedia Brittannica article on linguistics or any elementary textbook on linguistics would show that all this signifier-signified stuff is outmoded and wrong.
IV
    Finally, then, I think there are two things to remember.  One, whenever you hear the terms signifier, signified, or signifying in Saussure's sense, whenever you hear metaphor or metonymy in Jakobson's sense, you are dealing with a weak, outmoded, and finally incorrect linguistics.  You have found the weak point in the argument, and you can dig in at that point, if you wish to topple it.  All these moves that assume text- active models of literary response are simply disguises for an old-fashioned, stimulus-response psychology or, more accurately, a stimulus-response psycholinguistics that simply won't hold water.

    The second thing is that Lacan is profoundly anti- psychoanalytic.  When Lacan adopts Saussure's idea of "signifying," he drops all of us out.  He drops us out of speaking, out of understanding language, or out of feeling roused by a poem or a movie.  He drops us out of understanding one another, understanding oneself, and out of psychoanalyzing and being psychoanalyzed.  It is one thing for Saussure to drop out the human element. He did not want to try to do psychology.  But what are we to say of a psychoanalyst who does not want to do psychology?  And what can such a psychoanalysis contribute to literature, philosophy, or, quite simply, our understanding of the world around and within us?
Notes
1 For an excellent and very readable survey of contemporary linguistics, see Pinker (1994).

2 Chomsky (1986, pp. 19-28) contrasts E- language, external language, a fiction, with I-language, internal language, that is, the rules we know to speak and understand English---no fiction.

3 Saussure (1915), Fr., p. 38; Engl., p. 19.

4 I am indebted to my colleague in the linguistics program at the University of Florida, D. Gary Miller, for this information.

5 Saussure (1915) discusses sentences at Fr., p. 176-192; Engl., p. 127-139.

6  Saussure (1915), Fr., p. 139; Engl., p. 191.

7  Saussure (1915), Fr., p. 172; Engl., p. 124.

8 Chomsky (1986), pp. 19 and 32.

9 In this and the next paragraph, I am drawing on John Lyons' excellent introduction to Chomsky's work (Lyons 1978, 45).  See also Chomsky (1957), ch. 3.

10 Chomsky (1972), p. 20.
Fix numbers from here on.

11 Marcus (1984), 254-55.


12 Turner (1987), p. 12.

13 Benvenuto and Kennedy (1986), p. 24.

14 Lacan (1956), p. 32; (1972), p. 60. Benvenuto and Kennedy (1986) cite this astonishing passage on p. 99.

15 Saussure (1915), Fr., p. 317; Engl., p. 232.

16 Saussure (1915), Fr., p. 317; Engl., p. 232.

17 Saussure (1915), Fr., p. 25; Engl., p. 9;.

18 Saussure (1915), Fr., p. 28; Eng. 12.

19 Chomsky (1964), p. 25.

20 Tallis (1988), p. 153.

21 For a sample of the literature in this field see Crowder (1982); Dillon (1978); Kintgen (1983); Kolers (1972); Laberge and Samuels (1977); Meek (1983); Smith (1982); Spiro, Bruce, and Brewer (1980); or Taylor and Taylor (1983).

22 Lacan (1949; 1966/1977), but see also Benvenuto and Kennedy (1986), p. 47.

23 Stern (1971; 1974; 1977).

24 Mahler and McDevitt, (1982).

25 Amsterdam (1969, 1972); Lewis (1985a, 1985b); Dixon (1957); Gallup (1979); Brooks-Gunn (1975, 1984; Kronen (1982).


Works Cited

Amsterdam, B. K.  Mirror-behavior in Children Under Two Years of Age.  Diss.  Chapel Hill: University of North Carolina, 1969.

-----.  "Mirror Self-image Reactions Before Age Two."  Developmental Psychobiology 5 (1972): 297-305.

Baldwin, James Mark.  Mental Development in the Child and the Race: Methods and Processes.  2nd ed.  New York and London: Macmillan, 1903.

Benvenuto, Bice, and Roger Kennedy.  The Works of Jacques Lacan: An Introduction.  New York: St. Martin's, 1986.

Brooks-Gunn, Jeanne, and Michael Lewis.  "The Development of Early Visual Self Recognition in Infancy."  Developmental Review 4 (1984): 215-39.

-----.  "Mirror-image Stimulation and Self-Recognition in Infancy."  1975. ERIC ED no. 114 193.

Chomsky, Noam.  Current Issues in Linguistic Theory.  The Hague: Mouton, 1964.

-----.  Knowledge of Language: Its Nature, Origin, and Use. Convergence: A Series Founded, Planned, and Edited by Ruth Nanda Anshen.  New York: Praeger, 1986.

-----.  Language and Mind.  Enlarged Ed.  New York: Harcourt Brace Jovanovich, 1972.

-----. "A Review of B. F. Skinner's Verbal Behavior." Language 35 (1959): 26-58.  The Structure of Language: Readings in the Philosophy of Language.  Ed. Jerry A. Fodor and Jerrold J. Katz. Englewood Cliffs NJ: Prentice-Hall, 1964, pp. 547-78.

-----.  Syntactic Structures.  The Hague: Mouton, 1957.

Crowder, Robert G.  The Psychology of Reading: An Introduction.  New York: Oxford UP, 1982.

Dillon, George L.  Language Processing and the Reading of Literature: Toward a Model of Comprehension.  Bloomington IN: Indiana UP, 1978.

Dixon, J. C.  "Development of Self-recognition."  Journal of Genetic Psychology 91 (1957): 251-56.

Gallup, G. G., Jr.  "Self-recognition in Chimpanzees and Man; a Developmental and Comparative Perspective."  The Child and Its Family; the Genesis of Behavior.  Eds. M. Lewis and L. Rosenblum.  Vol. 2.  Plenum, 1979.  107-26.

Kintgen, Eugene R.  The Perception of Poetry.  Bloomington IN: Indiana UP, 1983.

Kolers, Paul A.  "Experiments in Reading."  Scientific American July 1972, 84-91.

Kronen, Jerilyn.  "Maternal Facial Mirroring at Four Months." Dissertation Abstracts International 43.4 (1982): 1237-B. Dissertation, Yeshiva University.

Laberge, David, and S. Jay Samuels, eds.  Basic Processes in Reading: Perception and Comprehension.  New York: Lawrence Erlbaum, 1977.

Lacan, Jacques.  Écrits.  Paris: Éditions Du Seuil, 1966.

-----.  "The Mirror Stage as Formative of the Function of the I as Revealed in Psychoanalytic Experience."  Écrits: A Selection.  Trans. Alan Sheridan.  1949.  New York: W. W. Norton, 1977.  1-7.

-----.  "Le Séminaire sur `La Lettre Volée.'"  La Psychanalyse 2 (1956b): 1-44.

-----.  "The Seminar on `The Purloined Letter'"  Trans. Jeffrey Mehlman. Yale French Studies 48 (1972): 38-72.  1956b.

-----.  "Le Stade Du Miroir comme Formateur de la Fonction Du Je." Revue françlaise de psychanalyse 4 (1949): 449-55.

Lewis, Michael, and Jeanne Brooks.  "Infants' Social Perception: A Constructivist View."  Developmental Psychobiology 21.6 (1985a): 1181- 87.

Lewis, Michael, Jeanne Brooks-Gunn, and John Jaskir.  "Individual Differences in Visual Self-recognition as a Function of Mother-infant Attachment Relationship."  Developmental Psychobiology 21.6 (1985b): 1181-87.

Lyons, John.  Noam Chomsky.  2nd ed.  1970.  Penguin Modern Masters. Harmondsworth: Penguin Books, 1978.

Mahler, Margaret, and John B. McDevitt.  "Thoughts on the Emergence of the Sense of Self, with Particular Emphasis on the Body Self."  Journal of the American Psychoanalytic Association 30.4 (1982): 827-48.

Marcus, Mitchell.  "Some Inadequate Theories of Human Language Processing." Talking Minds: The Study of Language in Cognitive Science.  Eds. Thomas G. Bever, John M. Carroll, and Lance A. Miller.  Cambridge MA: MIT P, 1984. 253-77.

Meek, Margaret, et al.  Achieving Literacy: Longitudinal Studies of Adolescents Learning to Read.  London and Boston: Routledge and Kegan Paul, 1983.

Pinker, Steven.  The Language Instinct.  New York: HarperPerennial, 1994.

Saussure, Ferdinand de.  Cours de Linguistique Générale.  Eds. Charles Bally, Albert Sechehaye, and Albert Riedlinger.  Paris: Payot, 1955.

-----.  Course in General Linguistics.  Eds. Charles Bally, Albert Sechehaye, and Albert Reidlinger.  Trans. Wade Baskin.  New York: Philosophical Library, 1959.

Smith, Frank.  Understanding Reading: A Psycholinguistic Analysis of Reading and Learning to Read.  3rd ed.  New York: Holt, Rinehart, and Winston, 1982.

Spiro, Rand J., Bertram C. Bruce, and William F. Brewer, eds. Theoretical Issues in Reading Comprehension: Perspectives from Cognitive Psychology, Linguistics, Artificial Intelligence, and Education. Hillsdale NJ: Lawrence Erlbaum, 1980.

Stern, Daniel M.  "Mother and Infant at Play: The Dyadic Interaction Involving Facial, Vocal, and Gaze Behaviors."  The Effect of the Infant on Its Caregiver.  Eds. Michael Lewis and L. A. Rosenbaum.  New York: Wiley, 1974.

Stern, Daniel N.  The First Relationship: Infant and Mother.  The Developing Child.  Cambridge MA: Harvard UP, 1977.

-----.  "A Micro-analysis of Mother-infant Interaction: Behaviors Regulating Social Contact Between a Mother and Her Three-and-a-half-month-old Twins."  Journal of the American Academy of Child Psychiatry 10 (1971): 501-17.

Tallis, Raymond.  Not Saussure: A Critique of Post-Saussurean Literary Theory.  London: Macmillan, 1988.

Taylor, Insup, and M. Martin Taylor.  The Psychology of Reading. New York: Academic, 1983.

Turner, Mark.  Death is the Mother of Beauty: Mind, Metaphor, Criticism.  Chicago: U of Chicago P, 1987.




Norman N. Holland


If you have comments, as well you might, email me at nholland@ufl.edu








Jacques Balmat and Horace Bénédict de Saussure - Chamonix valley | France in Photos













































 AlbumsAlpsSavoyChamonix valleyJacques Balmat and Horace Bénédict de Saussure










Jacques Balmat and Horace Bénédict de Saussure









CaptionThis statue is in the center of the town of Chamonix. It depicts the guide Jacques Balmat showing the top of the Mont Blanc to Horace Bénédict de Saussure. I think I misaligned the shot as it does not point towards the Mont Blanc.
LocationCountry: France
Tags mountain landscape, 
mountain range, 
statue

Other infoViews: 2828Copyright: Olivier Ffrench 

Jacques Balmat and Horace Bénédict de Saussure by Olivier Ffrench is licensed under a Creative Commons Attribution-NonCommercial-ShareAlike 4.0 International License. 
It can be used for non-commercial purposes with the following text and link: Photo from: <a href="http://www.france-in-photos.com/">France in Photos</a>




		Image Info	

Camera Maker:Canon
Camera Model:Canon EOS 5D Mark II
Original Time Taken:07/29/2011
Shutter Speed:1/1000 sec
Aperture:f/8
ISO Sensitivity:250
Focal Length:65 mm
Lens Info:EF24-105mm f/4L IS USM
Latitude:45.923786666667
Longitude:6.8696916666667




 

			Related images		





Laricio pines at Bavella







Facing Bavella







Mountainside







Sphinx







Guardian dog at the entrance of the Chantilly park







Anne of Montmorency statue







Horse city







Statue and Fall colors in the Chantilly castle gardens












Albums


Paris

Alps

Dauphiné

Savoy

Bionnassay

Chamonix valley

Contamines Valley

Mont Blanc

saint-gervais-area





Auvergne

Brittany

Burgundy

Champagne

Charentes

Corsica

French Riviera

Ile de France

Limousin

Loire valley

Normandy

Picardie

Panoramas











Take a Paris photo tour

 






 













Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft











Semiotics for Beginners: Introduction









Semiotics for Beginners
Daniel Chandler

Introduction


If you go into a bookshop and ask them where to find a book on semiotics you are likely to meet 
with a blank look. Even worse, you might be asked to define what semiotics is - which would be a 
bit tricky if you were looking for a beginner's guide. It's worse still if you do know a bit 
about semiotics, because it can be hard to offer a simple definition which is of much use in 
the bookshop. If you've ever been in such a situation, you'll probably agree that it's wise not 
to ask. Semiotics could be anywhere. The shortest definition is that it is the study of 
signs. 
But that doesn't leave enquirers much wiser. 'What do you mean by a sign?' people usually 
ask next. The kinds of signs that are likely to spring immediately to mind are those which we 
routinely refer to as 'signs' in everyday life, such as road signs, pub signs and star signs. 
If you were to agree with them that semiotics can include the study of all these and 
more, people will probably assume that semiotics is about 'visual signs'. You would confirm 
their hunch if you said that signs can also be drawings, paintings and photographs, and by now 
they'd be keen to direct you to the art and photography sections. But if you are thick-skinned 
and tell them that it also includes words, sounds and 'body language' they may reasonably 
wonder what all these things have in common and how anyone could possibly study such disparate 
phenomena. If you get this far they've probably already 'read the signs' which suggest that you 
are either eccentric or insane and communication may have ceased. 


Assuming that you are not one of those annoying people 
who keeps everyone waiting with your awkward question, if you are searching for books on 
semiotics you could do worse than by starting off in the linguistics section. 





It is... possible to conceive of a science which studies the role of signs as part of 
social life. It would form part of social psychology, and hence of general psychology. 
We shall call it semiology (from the Greek semeîon, 'sign'). It would 
investigate the nature of signs and the laws governing them. Since it does not yet exist, 
one cannot say for certain that it will exist. But it has a right to exist, a place ready 
for it in advance. Linguistics is only one branch of this general science. The laws which 
semiology will discover will be laws applicable in linguistics, and linguistics will thus 
be assigned to a clearly defined place in the field of human knowledge. 
(Saussure 1983, 15-16; 
Saussure 1974, 16) 



Thus wrote the Swiss linguist 

Ferdinand de Saussure (1857-1913), a founder not 
only of linguistics but also of what is now more usually referred to as semiotics (in 
his Course in General Linguistics, 1916). Other than Saussure (the usual 
abbreviation), key figures in the early development of semiotics were the American philosopher 

Charles Sanders Peirce 
(sic, pronounced 'purse') (1839-1914) and later 

Charles William Morris (1901-1979), who developed a behaviourist semiotics. 
Leading modern semiotic theorists include 

Roland Barthes (1915-1980), 

Algirdas Greimas (1917-1992), 

Yuri Lotman (1922-1993),  

Christian Metz (1931-1993), 

Umberto Eco (b 1932) and 

Julia Kristeva (b 1941). A number of linguists other than Saussure have worked within a 
semiotic framework, such as 

Louis Hjelmslev (1899-1966) and 

Roman Jakobson (1896-1982). 

It is difficult to disentangle European semiotics from 

structuralism in its origins; major structuralists include not only Saussure but also 

Claude Lévi-Strauss (b. 1908) in anthropology (who saw his subject as a branch of semiotics) and 

Jacques Lacan (1901-1981) in psychoanalysis. 
Structuralism is an analytical method which has been employed by many semioticians and which is based 
on Saussure's linguistic model. Structuralists seek to describe the overall organization 
of sign systems as 'languages' - as with Lévi-Strauss and myth, kinship rules and totemism, 
Lacan and the unconscious and Barthes and Greimas and the 'grammar' of narrative. 
They engage in a search for 'deep structures' underlying the 'surface features' 
of phenomena. However, contemporary social semiotics has moved 
beyond the structuralist concern with the internal relations of parts within a 
self-contained system, seeking to explore the use of signs in specific social situations. 

Modern semiotic theory is also sometimes allied with a 

Marxist approach which stresses the role of ideology. 


Semiotics began to become a major approach to cultural studies in the late 
1960s, partly as a result of the work of Roland Barthes. The translation 
into English of his popular essays in a collection entitled 
Mythologies
(Barthes 1957), 
followed in the 1970s and 1980s by many of his other 
writings, greatly increased scholarly awareness of this approach. Writing in 1964, 
Barthes declared 
that 'semiology aims to take in any system of signs, whatever their substance and 
limits; images, gestures, musical sounds, objects, and the complex associations of 
all of these, which form the content of ritual, convention or public entertainment: 
these constitute, if not languages, at least systems of signification' 
(Barthes 1967, 9). 
The adoption of semiotics in Britain was influenced by its prominence in the 
work of the Centre for Contemporary Cultural Studies (CCCS) at the University of 
Birmingham whilst the centre was under the direction of the neo-Marxist sociologist 
Stuart Hall (director 1969-79). Although semiotics may be less central now within 
cultural and media studies 
(at least in its earlier, more structuralist form), it remains essential for 
anyone in the field to understand it. What individual scholars have to assess, 
of course, is whether and how semiotics may be useful in shedding light on any 
aspect of their concerns. 

Note that Saussure's term, 'semiology' is sometimes used 
to refer to the Saussurean tradition, whilst 'semiotics' sometimes refers to the 
Peircean tradition, but that nowadays the term 'semiotics' is more likely to be used 
as an umbrella term to embrace the whole field 
(Nöth 1990, 14). 


Semiotics is not widely institutionalized as an academic discipline. It is a field of 
study involving many different theoretical stances and methodological tools. One of the 
broadest definitions is that of Umberto Eco, who states that 'semiotics is concerned with 
everything that can be taken as a sign' 
(Eco 1976, 7). 
Semiotics involves the study not only of what we refer to as 'signs' in everyday speech, 
but of anything which 'stands for' something else. In a semiotic sense, signs take the form of 
words, images, sounds, gestures and objects. 
Whilst for the linguist Saussure, 'semiology' was 'a science which studies the role of signs as 
part of social life', for the philosopher Charles Peirce 'semiotic' was the 'formal doctrine of 
signs' which was closely related to Logic 
(Peirce 1931-58, 2.227). 
For him, 'a sign... is something which stands to somebody for something in some respect or 
capacity' 
(Peirce 1931-58, 2.228). 
He declared that 'every thought is a sign' 
(Peirce 1931-58, 1.538; cf. 5.250ff, 5.283ff). 
Contemporary semioticians study signs not in isolation 
but as part of semiotic 'sign systems' (such as a medium or genre). 
They study how meanings are made: as such, being concerned not 
only with communication but also with the construction and maintenance of reality. 
Semiotics and that branch of linguistics known as semantics have a common concern with 
the meaning of signs, but John Sturrock argues that whereas semantics focuses on what 
words mean, semiotics is concerned with how signs mean 
(Sturrock 1986, 22). 
For C W Morris (deriving this threefold classification from Peirce), semiotics embraced 
semantics, along with the other traditional branches of linguistics: 





semantics: the relationship of signs to what they stand for;
syntactics (or syntax): the formal or structural relations between signs; 
pragmatics: the relation of signs to interpreters 
(Morris 1938, 6-7). 




Semiotics is often employed in the analysis of texts (although it is 
far more than just a mode of textual analysis). 

Here it should perhaps be noted that a 'text' can exist in any medium and may 
be verbal, non-verbal, or both, despite the 

logocentric bias of this distinction. The term text usually refers to a message 
which has been recorded in some way (e.g. writing, audio- and video-recording) so that it is 
physically independent of its 

sender or receiver. 
A text is an assemblage of signs (such as words, images, sounds 
and/or gestures) constructed (and interpreted) with reference to the 
conventions associated with a 
 
genre and in a particular medium of communication. 


The term 'medium' 
is used in a variety of ways by different theorists, and may include 
such broad categories as speech and writing or print and broadcasting 
or relate to specific technical forms within the mass media 
(radio, television, newspapers, magazines, books, photographs, films and 
records) or the media of interpersonal communication (telephone, 
letter, fax, e-mail, video-conferencing, computer-based chat systems). 

Some theorists classify media according to the 'channels' involved 
(visual, auditory, tactile and so on) 
(Nöth 1995, 175).  
Human experience is inherently multisensory, and every representation 
of experience is subject to the constraints and affordances of the 
medium involved. Every medium is constrained by the channels which it utilizes. 
For instance, even in the very flexible medium of language 'words fail us' in 
attempting to represent some experiences, and we 
have no way at all of representing smell or touch with conventional media. 
Different media and genres provide different frameworks for representing 
experience, facilitating some forms of expression and inhibiting others. 

The differences between media lead Emile Benveniste to argue that 
the 'first principle' of semiotic systems is that they are not 'synonymous': 
'we are not able to say "the same thing"' in systems based on different 
units (in 
Innis 1986, 235) in contrast to 
Hjelmslev, who asserted that 'in practice, language is a semiotic into 
which all other semiotics may be translated' (cited in 
Genosko 1994, 62). 


The everyday use of a medium by someone who knows how to use it typically passes unquestioned as 
unproblematic and 'neutral': this is hardly surprising since media evolve as a means of 
accomplishing purposes in which they are usually intended to be incidental. And the more 
frequently and fluently a medium is used, the more 'transparent' or 'invisible' to its users it 
tends to become. For most routine purposes, awareness of a medium may hamper its 
effectiveness as a means to an end. Indeed, it is typically when the medium acquires 
transparency that its potential to fulfil its primary function is greatest. 


The selectivity of any medium leads to its use having influences of which the user may not 
always be conscious, and which may not have been part of the purpose in using it. We can be so 
familiar with the medium that we are 'anaesthetized' to the mediation it involves: we 'don't 
know what we're missing'. Insofar as we are numbed to the processes involved we cannot be said 
to be exercising 'choices' in its use. In this way the means we use may modify our ends. Amongst 
the phenomena enhanced or reduced by media selectivity are the ends for which a medium was used. 
In some  cases, our 'purposes' may be subtly (and perhaps invisibly), redefined by our use of a 
particular medium. This is the 
opposite of the pragmatic and rationalistic stance, according to which the means are chosen to 
suit the user's ends, and are entirely under the user's control. 


An awareness of this phenomenon of transformation by media has often led media theorists to 
argue deterministically that our technical means and systems always and inevitably become 'ends 
in themselves' (a common interpretation of Marshall McLuhan's famous aphorism, 'the medium is 
the message'), and has even led some to present media as wholly autonomous entities with 
'purposes' (as opposed to functions) of their own. However, one need not adopt such extreme 
stances in acknowledging the transformations involved in processes of mediation. When we use a 
medium for any purpose, its use becomes part of that purpose. Travelling is an unavoidable part 
of getting somewhere; it may even become a primary goal. Travelling by one particular method of 
transport rather than another is part of the experience. So too with writing rather than 
speaking, or using a word processor rather than a pen. In using any medium, to some extent we 
serve its 'purposes' as well as it serving ours. When we engage with media we both act and are 
acted upon, use and are used. Where a medium has a variety of functions it may be impossible to 
choose to use it for only one of these functions in isolation. The making of meanings with such 
media must involve some degree of compromise. Complete identity between any specific purpose and 
the functionality of a medium is likely to be rare, although the degree of match may on most 
occasions be accepted as adequate. 


I am reminded here of an observation by the anthropologist Claude Lévi-Strauss that in the case 
of what he called bricolage, the process of creating something is not a matter of the 
calculated choice and use of whatever materials are technically best-adapted to a clearly 
predetermined purpose, but rather it involves a 'dialogue with the materials and means of execution' 
(Lévi-Strauss 1974, 29). 
In such a dialogue, the materials which are ready-to-hand may (as we 
say) 'suggest' adaptive courses of action, and the initial aim may be modified. Consequently, 
such acts of creation are not purely instrumental: the bricoleur '"speaks" not only with 
things... but also through the medium of things' 

(ibid., 21): the use of the medium can be 
expressive. The context of Lévi-Strauss's point was a discussion of 
'mythical thought', but I would argue that bricolage can be involved in the use of any medium, 
for any purpose. The act of writing, for instance, may be shaped not only by the writer's 
conscious purposes but also by features of the media involved - such as the kind of language 
and writing tools used - as well as by the social and psychological processes of mediation 
involved. 
Any 'resistance' offered by the writer's materials can be an intrinsic part of the 
process of writing. However, not every writer acts or feels like a bricoleur. Individuals 
differ strikingly in their responses to the notion of media transformation. They range from 
those who insist that they are in total control of the media which they 'use' to those who 
experience a profound sense of being shaped by the media which 'use' them 
(Chandler 1995). 


Norman Fairclough comments on the importance of the 
differences between the various mass media in the channels and technologies 
they draw upon.


The press uses a visual channel, its language is written, and it draws 
upon technologies of photographic reproduction, graphic design, and 
printing. Radio, by contrast, uses an oral channel and spoken language 
and relies on technologies of sound recording and broadcasting, whilst 
television combines technologies of sound- and image-recording and 
broadcasting... 


These differences in channel and technology have significant wider 
implications in terms of the meaning potential of the different media. 
For instance, print is in an important sense less personal than radio 
or television. Radio begins to allow individuality and personality to 
be foregrounded through transmitting individual qualities of voice. 
Television takes the process much further by making people visually 
available, and not in the frozen modality of newspaper photographs, 
but in movement and action. 
(Fairclough 1995, 38-9)



Whilst 

technological determinists emphasize that semiotic ecologies are influenced by the 
fundamental design features of different media, it is important to recognize the importance of 
socio-cultural and historical factors in shaping how different media are used and their 
(ever-shifting) status within particular cultural contexts. For instance, many contemporary 
cultural theorists have remarked on the growth of the importance of visual media compared with 
linguistic media in contemporary society and the associated shifts in the communicative 
functions of such media. 

Thinking in 'ecological' terms about the interaction of different semiotic structures and 
languages led the Russian cultural semiotician Yuri Lotman to coin the 
term 'semiosphere' to refer to 'the whole semiotic space of the culture in question' 
(Lotman 1990, 124-125). The concept is 
related to ecologists' references to 'the biosphere' and perhaps to cultural theorists'  
references to the public and private spheres, but most reminiscent of Teilhard de 
Chardin's notion (dating back to 1949) of the 'noosphere' - the domain in 
which mind is exercised. 
Whilst Lotman referred to such semiospheres as governing the functioning of languages within 
cultures, John Hartley comments that 'there is more than one level at which one might identify a 
semiosphere - at the level of a single national or linguistic culture, for instance, or of a 
larger unity such as "the West", right up to "the species"'; we might similarly characterize 
the semiosphere of a particular historical period 
(Hartley 1996, 106). This conception of a 
semiosphere may make semioticians seem territorially imperialistic to their critics, but it 
offers a more unified and dynamic vision of semiosis than the study of a specific medium as if 
each existed in a vacuum. 


There are, of course, other approaches to 

textual analysis apart from semiotics - notably  

rhetorical analysis, 

discourse analysis and 

'content analysis'. In the field of media and communication studies 
content analysis is a prominent rival to semiotics as a method of textual analysis. 
Whereas semiotics is now closely associated with cultural studies, content 
analysis is well-established within the mainstream tradition of social 
science research. Whilst content analysis involves a 
quantitative approach to the analysis of the manifest 'content' of media texts, 
semiotics seeks to analyse media texts as structured wholes and investigates 
latent, 

connotative meanings. Semiotics is rarely 
quantitative, and often involves a rejection of such approaches. Just because an item occurs 
frequently in a text does not make it significant. The structuralist semiotician is more 
concerned with the relation of elements to each other. A 
social semiotician would also emphasize the importance of the significance which 
readers attach to the signs within a text. 
Whereas content analysis focuses on explicit content and tends to suggest that this 
represents a single, fixed meaning, semiotic studies focus on the system of rules 
governing the 'discourse' involved in media texts, stressing the role of semiotic 
context in shaping meaning. However, some researchers 
have combined semiotic analysis and content analysis (e.g. 
Glasgow University Media Group 1980; 
Leiss et al. 1990; 
McQuarrie & Mick 1992). 


Some commentators adopt C W Morris's definition of semiotics (in the spirit 
of Saussure) as 'the science of signs' 
(Morris 1938, 1-2). The term 'science' is misleading. 
As yet semiotics involves no widely-agreed theoretical assumptions, models or empirical 
methodologies. Semiotics has tended to be largely theoretical, many of its theorists seeking to 
establish its scope and general principles. Peirce and Saussure, for instance, were both 
concerned with the fundamental definition of the sign. Peirce developed elaborate logical 
taxonomies of types of signs. Subsequent semioticians have sought to identify and categorize the 
codes or conventions according to which signs are organized. 
Clearly there is a need to establish a firm 
theoretical foundation for a subject which is currently characterized by a host of competing 
theoretical assumptions. As for methodologies, Saussure's theories constituted a starting point 
for the development of various structuralist methodologies for analysing texts and social 
practices. These have been very widely employed in the analysis of a host of cultural phenomena. 
However, such methods are not universally accepted: socially-oriented theorists have criticized 
their exclusive focus on structure, and no alternative methodologies have as yet been widely 
adopted. Some semiotic research is empirically-oriented, 
applying and testing semiotic principles. Bob Hodge and David Tripp employed empirical methods 
in their classic study of Children and Television
(Hodge & Tripp 1986). But there is at 
present little sense of semiotics as a unified enterprise building on cumulative research 
findings. 


Semiotics represents a range of studies in art, literature, anthropology and the mass 
media rather than an independent academic discipline. Those involved in semiotics 
include linguists, philosophers, psychologists, sociologists, anthropologists, 
literary, aesthetic and media theorists, psychoanalysts and educationalists. 
Beyond the most basic definition, 
there is considerable variation amongst leading semioticians as to what semiotics 
involves. It is not only concerned with (intentional) communication but also with our  
ascription of significance to anything in the world. Semiotics has changed over time, since 
semioticians have sought to remedy weaknesses in early semiotic approaches. Even with the 
most basic semiotic terms there are multiple definitions. Consequently, 
anyone attempting semiotic analysis would be wise to make clear which definitions 
are being applied and, if a particular semiotician's approach is being adopted, what 
its source is. 


There are two divergent traditions in semiotics stemming respectively 
from Saussure and Peirce. 
The work of Louis Hjelmslev, Roland Barthes, Claude Lévi-Strauss, Julia Kristeva, 
Christian Metz and Jean Baudrillard (b 1929) follows in the 'semiological' tradition of 
Saussure whilst that of 
Charles W Morris, Ivor A Richards (1893-1979), Charles K Ogden (1989-1957) and 
Thomas Sebeok (b 1920) is in the 'semiotic' tradition of Peirce. The leading 
semiotician bridging these two traditions is the celebrated Italian author Umberto Eco, who 
as the author of the bestseller The Name of the Rose (novel 1980, film 1986) is probably  
the only semiotician whose film rights are of any value 
(Eco 1980).



Saussure argued that 
'nothing is more appropriate than the study of languages to bring out the nature of the 
semiological problem' 
(Saussure 1983, 16; 
Saussure 1974, 16). 
Semiotics draws heavily on linguistic concepts, partly because of the 
influence of Saussure and because linguistics is a more established 
discipline than the study of other sign systems. Structuralists adopted language as their 
model in exploring a much wider range of social phenomena: 
Lévi-Strauss for myth, kinship rules and totemism; Lacan for the unconscious; 
Barthes and Greimas for the 'grammar' of narrative. 
Julia Kristeva declared that 'what semiotics has discovered... is that the law 
governing or, if one prefers, the major constraint affecting any social practice lies 
in the fact that it signifies; i.e. that it is articulated like a language' 
(cited in 
Hawkes 1977, 125). 
Saussure referred to language (his model being speech) as 'the most important' 
of all of the systems of signs 
(Saussure 1983, 15; 
Saussure 1974, 16). 
Language is almost unvariably regarded as the most powerful communication system by far. 
For instance, Marvin Harris observes that 
'human languages are unique among communication systems in possessing semantic 
universality... A communication system that has semantic universality 
can convey information about all aspects, domains, properties, places, or events in the 
past, present or future, whether actual or possible, real or imaginary' (cited in 
Wilden 1987, 138). 
Perhaps language is indeed fundamental: Emile Benveniste observed that 'language is the 
interpreting system of all other systems, linguistic and non-linguistic' (in 
Innis 1986, 239), whilst 
Claude Lévi-Strauss noted that 'language is the semiotic system par excellence; 
it cannot but signify, and exists only through signification' 
(Lévi-Strauss 1972, 48). 


Saussure saw linguistics as a branch of 'semiology': 


Linguistics is only one branch of this general science [of semiology]. The laws which 
semiology will discover will be laws applicable in linguistics... As far as we are concerned... 
the linguistic problem is first and foremost semiological... If one wishes to discover the 
true nature of language systems, one must first consider what they have in common with 
all other systems of the same kind... In this way, light will be thrown not only upon the 
linguistic problem. By considering rites, customs etc. as signs, it will be possible, we 
believe, to see them in a new perspective. The need will be felt to consider them as 
semiological phenomena and to explain them in terms of the laws of semiology. 
(Saussure 1983, 16-17; 
Saussure 1974, 16-17) 



Whilst Roland Barthes declared that 'perhaps we must invert Saussure's formulation and assert 
that semiology is a branch of linguistics', others have accepted Saussure's location of 
linguistics within semiotics 
(Barthes 1985, xi). 
Other than himself, Jean-Marie Floch instances Hjelmslev and Greimas 
(Floch 2000, 93). 
However, even if we theoretically locate linguistics within semiotics it is difficult to avoid 
adopting the linguistic model in exploring other sign systems. 

Semioticians commonly refer to films, television and 
radio programmes, advertising posters and so on as 'texts', and to 'reading television' 
(Fiske and Hartley 1978). 

Media such as television and film are regarded by some semioticians as being in some respects 
like 'languages'. The issue tends to revolve around whether film is closer to what we treat as 
'reality' in the everyday world of our own experience or whether it has more in common with a 
symbolic system like writing. 

Some refer to the 'grammar' of media other than language. 
For James Monaco, 'film has no grammar', and he  offers a useful critique of glib analogies 
between film techniques and the grammar of natural language 
(ibid., 129). 
There is a danger of trying to force all media into a linguistic framework. With regard to 
photography (though one might say the same for film and television), Victor Burgin insists that:

'There is no 'language' of photography, no single signifying system (as opposed to technical 
apparatus) upon which all photographs depend (in the sense in which all texts in English depend 
upon the English language); there is, rather, a heterogeneous complex of 

codes upon which photography may draw' 
(Burgin 1982b, 143). 


We will shortly examine Saussure's model of the sign, but before doing so it is important to 
understand something about the general framework within which he situated it. 


Saussure made what is now a famous distinction between langue 
(language) and parole (speech). Langue refers to the 
system of rules and conventions which is independent of, and pre-exists, 
individual users; parole refers to its use in particular instances. 
Applying the notion to semiotic systems in general rather than simply to 
language, the distinction is one between between code and message, 
structure and event or system and usage (in specific texts or 
contexts). According 
to the Saussurean distinction, in a semiotic system such as cinema, 
'any specific film is the speech of that underlying system of 
cinema language' 
(Langholz Leymore 1975, 3). 
Saussure focused on langue rather than parole. To the traditional, Saussurean 
semiotician, what matters most are the underlying structures and rules 
of a semiotic system as a whole rather than specific performances or 
practices which are merely instances of its use. Saussure's approach was to study the system 
'synchronically' if it were frozen in time (like a photograph) - rather than 
'diachronically' - in terms of its evolution over time (like a film). Structuralist cultural 
theorists subsequently adopted this Saussurean priority, focusing on the functions of social 
and cultural phenomena within semiotic systems. Theorists differ over whether 
the system precedes and determines usage (structural determinism) or whether usage 
precedes and determines the system (social determinism) (although note that most structuralists 
argue that the system constrains rather than completely determines usage). 


The structuralist dichotomy between usage and system has been criticized for its 
rigidity, splitting process from product, subject from structure 
(Coward & Ellis 1977, 4, 14). 
The prioritization of structure over usage fails to account for changes in 
structure. Marxist theorists have been particularly critical of this. 
In the late 1920s, Valentin Volosinov (1884/5-1936) and Mikhail Bakhtin (1895-1975) 
criticized Saussure's synchronic approach and his 
emphasis on internal relations within the system of language 
(Voloshinov 1973; 
Morris 1994). 
Volosinov reversed the Saussurean priority of langue over parole: 
'The sign is part of organized social intercourse and cannot exist, as such, outside it, 
reverting to a mere physical artifact' 
(Voloshinov 1973, 21). 
The meaning of a sign is not in its relationship to other signs within the language system  
but rather in the social context of its use. 
Saussure was criticized for ignoring historicity 
(ibid., 61).  
The Prague school linguists Roman Jakobson and Yuri Tynyanov declared in 1927 that 
'pure synchronism now proves to be an illusion', 
adding that 'every synchronic system has its past and its future as inseparable structural 
elements of the system' 
(cited in Voloshinov 1973, 166). 
Writing in 1929, Volosinov observed that 'there is no real moment in time when a synchronic 
system of language could be constructed... A synchronic system may be said to exist only from 
the point of view of the subjective consciousness of an individual speaker belonging to some 
particular language group at some particular moment of historical time' 
(Voloshinov 1973, 66). Whilst the 
French structuralist Claude Lévi-Strauss applied a synchronic approach 
in the domain of anthropology, 
most contemporary semioticians have sought to reprioritize historicity and social context. 
Language is seldom treated as a static, closed and stable system which is inherited from 
preceding generations but as constantly changing. The sign, as Voloshinov put it, is 
'an arena of the class struggle' 
(ibid., 23). 
Seeking to establish a wholeheartedly 'social semiotics', Robert Hodge and Gunther Kress 
declare that 'the social dimensions of semiotic systems are so intrinsic to their 
nature and function that the systems cannot be studied in isolation' 
(Hodge & Kress 1988, 1). 


Whilst Saussure may be hailed as a founder of semiotics, semiotics 
has become increasingly less Saussurean. Teresa de Lauretis describes 
the movement away from structuralist semiotics which began 
in the 1970s: 


In the last decade or so, semiotics has undergone a shift of its 
theoretical gears: a shift away from the classification of sign 
systems - their basic units, their levels of structural organization - 
and towards the exploration of the modes of production of signs and 
meanings, the ways in which systems and codes are used, transformed 
or transgressed in social practice. While formerly the emphasis was 
on studying sign systems (language, literature, cinema, architecture, 
music, etc.), conceived of as mechanisms that generate messages, what 
is now being examined is the work performed through them. 

It is this 
work or activity which constitutes and/or transforms the codes, at 
the same time as it constitutes and transforms the individuals using 
the codes, performing the work; the individuals who are, therefore, 
the subjects of semiosis. 


'Semiosis', a term borrowed from Charles Sanders Peirce, is expanded 
by Eco to designate the process by which a culture produces signs 
and/or attributes meaning to signs. Although for Eco meaning production 
or semiosis is a social activity, he allows that subjective factors are 
involved in each individual act of semiosis. The notion then might be 
pertinent to the two main emphases of current, or poststructuralist, 
semiotic theory. 

One is a semiotics focused on the subjective aspects 
of signification and strongly influenced by Lacanian psychoanalysis, 
where meaning is construed as a subject-effect (the subject being an 
effect of the signifier). The other is a semiotics concerned to stress 
the social aspect of signification, its practical, aesthetic, or 
ideological use in interpersonal communication; there, meaning is 
construed as semantic value produced through culturally shared codes.
(de Lauretis 1984, 167)



This text outlines some of the key concepts in semiotics, together with relevant critiques, 
beginning with the most fundamental concept of the sign itself. 
I hope it will prove to be a useful companion to the reader in finding their own path 
through the subject. 
But before launching on an exploration of this intriguing but demanding subject let us 
consider why we should bother: why should we study semiotics? 
This is a pressing question in part because the writings of semioticians have a reputation for 
being dense with jargon: Justin Lewis notes that 'its advocates have written in a style that 
ranges from the obscure to the incomprehensible' 
(Lewis 1991, 25); 
another critic wittily remarked that 'semiotics tells us things we already know in a language we 
will never understand' (Paddy Whannel, cited in 
Seiter 1992, 1). 
The semiotic establishment is a very exclusive club but, 
as David Sless remarks, 'semiotics is far too important an enterprise to be left to semioticians' 
(Sless 1986, 1). 


Semiotics is important because it can help us not to take 'reality' 
for granted as something having a purely objective existence which is independent of human 
interpretation. It teaches us that reality is a system of signs. Studying semiotics can assist 
us to become more aware of reality as a construction and of the roles played by ourselves and 
others in constructing it. It can help us to realize that information or meaning is not 
'contained' in the world or in books, computers or audio-visual media. Meaning is not 
'transmitted' to us - we actively create it according to a complex interplay of codes or 
conventions of which we are normally unaware. Becoming aware of such codes is both inherently 
fascinating and intellectually empowering. We learn from semiotics that we live in a world of 
signs and we have no way of understanding anything except through signs and the codes into which 
they are organized. Through the study of semiotics we become aware that these signs and codes are normally 
transparent and disguise our task in 'reading' them. Living in a world of increasingly 
visual signs, we need to learn that even the most 'realistic' signs are not what they appear to 
be. By making more explicit the codes by which signs are interpreted we may perform 
the valuable semiotic function of 'denaturalizing' signs. In defining realities 
signs serve ideological functions. Deconstructing and contesting the realities of signs 
can reveal whose realities are privileged and whose are suppressed. The study of signs 
is the study of the construction and maintenance of reality. To decline such a study is to 
leave to others the control of the world of meanings which we inhabit. 








Contents


Contents Page
Preface
Introduction
Signs
Modality and representation
Paradigms and syntagms
Syntagmatic analysis
Paradigmatic analysis
Denotation, connotation and myth
Rhetorical tropes
Codes
Modes of address
Encoding/Decoding
Articulation
Intertextuality
Criticisms of semiotic analysis
Strengths of semiotic analysis
D.I.Y. semiotic analysis
Glossary of key terms
Suggested reading
References
Index
















Semiotics for Beginners: Signs









Semiotics for Beginners
Daniel Chandler

Signs



We seem as a species to be driven by a 

desire to make meanings: 
above all, we are surely Homo significans - meaning-makers. 
Distinctively, we make meanings through our creation and interpretation of 'signs'. 
Indeed, according to Peirce, 'we think only in signs' 
(Peirce 1931-58, 2.302). 
Signs take the form of words, 

images, sounds, odours, flavours, acts or objects, but such things have no intrinsic 
meaning and become signs only when we invest them with meaning. 
'Nothing is a sign unless it is interpreted as a sign', declares Peirce 
(Peirce 1931-58, 2.172). 
Anything can be a sign as long as someone interprets it as 'signifying' something - 
referring to or standing for something other than itself. 
We interpret things as signs largely unconsciously by relating them 
to familiar systems of conventions. It is this meaningful use of signs 
which is at the heart of the concerns of semiotics. 


The two dominant models of what constitutes a sign are those of the linguist 
Ferdinand de Saussure and the philosopher Charles Sanders Peirce. These will be 
discussed in turn. 




Saussure offered a 'dyadic' or two-part model of the sign. He defined a sign as 
being composed of: 


a 'signifier' (signifiant) - the form which the sign takes; and 
the 'signified' (signifié) - the concept it represents.



The sign is the whole that results from the association of the signifier with the 
signified 
(Saussure 1983, 67; 
Saussure 1974, 67). 

The relationship 
between the signifier and the signified is referred to as 'signification', 
and this is represented in the Saussurean diagram by the arrows. 

The horizontal line 
marking the two elements of the sign is referred to as 'the bar'. 


If we take a linguistic example, the word 'Open' 
(when it is invested with meaning by someone who encounters it on a 
shop doorway) is a sign consisting of: 


a signifier: the word open; 
a signified concept: that the shop is open for business. 



A sign must have both a signifier and a signified. You cannot have a totally meaningless 
signifier or a completely formless signified 
(Saussure 1983, 101; 
Saussure 1974, 102-103). 
A sign is a recognizable combination of a signifier with a particular signified. 
The same signifier (the word 'open') could stand for a 
different signified (and thus be a different sign) if it were on a 
push-button inside a lift ('push to open door'). 
Similarly, many signifiers could stand for the concept 
'open' (for instance,  on top of a packing carton, a small outline of a box 
with an open flap for 'open this end') - again, with each unique pairing 
constituting a different sign. 


Nowadays, whilst the basic 'Saussurean' model is commonly adopted, it tends to be a 
more materialistic model than that of Saussure himself. 
The signifier is now commonly interpreted as the 
material (or physical) form of the sign - it is something which can 
be seen, heard, touched, smelt or tasted. 
For Saussure, both the signifier and the signified were purely 'psychological' 
(Saussure 1983, 12, 14-15, 66; 
Saussure 1974, 12, 15, 65-66). 
Both were form rather than substance: 


A linguistic sign is not a link between a thing and a name, but between a concept and a sound 
pattern. The sound pattern is not actually a sound; for a sound is something physical. A sound 
pattern is the hearer's psychological impression of a sound, as given to him by the evidence of 
his senses. This sound pattern may be called a 'material' element only in that it is the 
representation of our sensory impressions. The sound pattern may thus be distinguished from 
the other element associated with it in a linguistic sign. This other element is generally of 
a more abstract kind: the concept. 
(Saussure 1983, 66; 
Saussure 1974, 66) 



Saussure was focusing on the linguistic sign (such as a word) 
 and he 
'phonocentrically' privileged the spoken word, referring 
specifically to the image acoustique ('sound-image' or 'sound pattern'), 
seeing writing as a separate, secondary, dependent but comparable sign system 
(Saussure 1983, 15, 24-25, 117; 
Saussure 1974, 15, 16, 23-24, 119). 
Within the ('separate') system of written signs, a signifier such as the written letter 't' 
signified a sound in the primary sign system of language (and thus a written word 
would also signify a sound rather than a concept). Thus for Saussure, writing relates to speech 
as signifier to signified. 
Most subsequent theorists who have adopted Saussure's model are content to refer to the form 
of linguistic signs as either spoken or written. We will return later to the issue of the 
post-Saussurean 'rematerialization' of the sign. 


As for the signified, 
most commentators who adopt Saussure's model still treat this as a mental construct, 
although they often note that it may nevertheless refer indirectly to things in the world. 
Saussure's original model of the sign 'brackets the referent': 
excluding reference to objects existing in the world. 
His signified is not to be identified directly with a referent  
but is a concept in the mind - not a thing but the notion of a thing. 
Some people may wonder why Saussure's model of the sign refers only to a concept 
and not to a thing. An observation from the philosopher Susanne Langer (who was not referring to 
Saussure's theories) may be useful here. Note that like most contemporary commentators, 
Langer uses the term 'symbol' to refer to the linguistic sign 
(a term which Saussure himself avoided): 
'Symbols are not proxy for their objects but are vehicles for the 
conception of objects... In talking about things we have conceptions of them, 
not the things themselves; and it is the conceptions, not the things, that symbols 
directly mean. Behaviour towards conceptions is what words normally evoke; this is the 
typical process of thinking'. She adds that 'If I say 
"Napoleon", you do not bow to the conqueror of Europe as though I had introduced him, but 
merely think of him' 
(Langer 1951, 61). 


Thus, for Saussure the linguistic sign is wholly immaterial - although he disliked 
referring to it as 'abstract' 
(Saussure 1983, 15; 
Saussure 1974, 15). 
The immateriality of the Saussurean sign is a feature which tends to be 
neglected in many popular commentaries. If the notion seems strange, 
we need to remind ourselves that words have no value in themselves - that is their value. 
Saussure noted that it is not the metal in a coin that fixes its value 
(Saussure 1983, 117; 
Saussure 1974, 118). Several reasons could be offered 
for this. For instance, if linguistic signs drew attention to their materiality this would 
hinder their communicative transparency 
(Langer 1951, 73). 
Furthermore, being immaterial, language is an extraordinarily economical medium and words are 
always ready-to-hand. Nevertheless, a principled argument can be made for the revaluation of the 
materiality of the sign, as we shall see in due course. 


Saussure noted that his choice of the terms signifier and signified 
helped to indicate 
'the distinction which separates each from the other' 
(Saussure 1983, 67; 
Saussure 1974, 67). 
Despite this, and the horizontal bar in his diagram of the sign, Saussure stressed that 
sound and thought (or the signifier and the signified) were as inseparable as the two sides of a 
piece of paper 
(Saussure 1983, 111; 
Saussure 1974, 113). 
They were 'intimately linked' in the mind 'by an associative link' - 'each triggers the other' 
(Saussure 1983, 66; 
Saussure 1974, 66). 
Saussure presented these elements as wholly interdependent, neither pre-existing the other 
(Silverman 1983, 103). 
Within the context of spoken language, a sign could not consist of sound without sense or of 
sense without sound. He used the two arrows in the diagram to suggest their interaction. 
The bar and the opposition nevertheless suggests that the signifier and the 
signified can be distinguished for analytical purposes. Poststructuralist theorists criticize 
the clear distinction which the Saussurean bar seems to suggest between the signifier and the 
signified; they seek to blur or erase it in order to reconfigure the sign or structural 
relations. Some theorists have argued that 'the signifier is always separated from the 
signified... and has a real autonomy' (Lechte 1994, 68), a point to which we will return in 
discussing the arbitrariness of the sign. 
Commonsense tends to insist that the signified takes precedence over, and pre-exists, the 
signifier: 'look after the sense', quipped Lewis Carroll, 'and the sounds will take care of 
themselves' (Alice's Adventures in Wonderland, chapter 9). However, in dramatic contrast, 
post-Saussurean theorists have seen the model as implicitly 
granting primacy to the signifier, thus reversing the commonsensical 
position. 


Louis Hjelmslev used the terms 'expression' and 'content' to 
refer to the signifier and signified respectively 
(Hjelmslev 1961, 47ff).  

The distinction between signifier and signified has sometimes been equated to the familiar 
dualism of 'form and content'. Within such a framework the signifier is seen as 
the form of the sign and the signified as the content. 
However, the metaphor of form as a 'container' is problematic, tending 
to support the equation of content with meaning, implying that 
meaning can be 'extracted' without an 

active process of interpretation and that form is not in itself 
meaningful 
(Chandler 1995 104-6). 


Saussure argued that signs only make 
sense as part of a formal, generalized and abstract system. His conception of meaning was purely 
structural and relational rather than referential: 
primacy is given to relationships rather than to things (the meaning of 
signs was seen as lying in their systematic relation to each other rather than deriving from any 
inherent features of signifiers or any reference to material things). 
Saussure did not define signs in terms of some 'essential' or intrinsic nature. 
For Saussure, signs refer primarily to each other. 
Within the language system, 'everything depends on relations' 
(Saussure 1983, 121; 
Saussure 1974, 122).
No sign makes sense on its own but only in relation to other signs. 
Both signifier and signified are purely relational entities  
(Saussure 1983, 118; 
Saussure 1974, 120). 
This notion can be hard to understand since we may 
feel that an individual word such as 'tree' does have some meaning for us, 
but its meaning depends on its context in relation to the other words with which it is used. 


Together with the 'vertical' alignment of signifier and signified within each individual 
sign (suggesting two structural 'levels'), the emphasis on the relationship between signs 
defines what are in effect two planes - that of the signifier and the signifier. 
Later, Louis Hjelmslev referred to the planes of 'expression' and 'content' 
(Hjelmslev 1961, 60). 
Saussure himself referred to sound and thought as two distinct but correlated 
planes. 'We can envisage... the language... as a series of adjoining subdivisions simultaneously 
imprinted both on the plane of vague, amorphous thought (A), and on the equally featureless 
plane of sound (B)' 
(Saussure 1983, 110-111; 
Saussure 1974, 112). 
The arbitrary division of the two continua into signs is suggested by the dotted lines 
whilst the wavy (rather than parallel) edges of the two 'amorphous' masses suggest 
the lack of any 'natural' fit between them. 
The gulf and lack of fit between the two planes highlights their relative autonomy. 
Whilst Saussure is careful not to refer directly to 'reality', Fredric Jameson 
reads into this feature of Saussure's system that 'it is not so much the 
individual word or sentence that "stands for" or "reflects" the individual object or event 
in the real world, but rather that the entire system of signs, the entire field of the 
langue, lies parallel to reality itself; that it is the totality of systematic 
language, in other words, which is analogous to whatever organized structures exist in the 
world of reality, and that our understanding proceeds from one whole or Gestalt to the other, 
rather than on a one-to-one basis' 
(Jameson 1972, 32-33). 






What Saussure refers to 
as the 'value' of a sign depends on its relations with other signs within the system - a sign 
has no 'absolute' value independent of this context  
(Saussure 1983, 80; 
Saussure 1974, 80). 
Saussure uses an analogy with the game of 
chess, noting that the value of each piece depends on its position on the chessboard 
(Saussure 1983, 88; 
Saussure 1974, 88). 
The sign is more than the sum of its parts. Whilst signification - what is 
signified - clearly depends on the relationship between the two parts of the sign, 
the value of a sign is determined by the relationships between the sign and other signs 
within the system as a whole 
(Saussure 1983, 112-113; 
Saussure 1974, 114). 


The notion of value... shows us that it is a great mistake to consider a sign as nothing more 
than the combination of a certain sound and a certain concept. To think of a sign as nothing 
more would be to isolate it from the system to which it belongs. It would be to suppose that 
a start could be made with individual signs, and a system constructed by putting them 
together. On the contrary, the system as a united whole is the starting point, from which it 
becomes possible, by a process of analysis, to identify its constituent elements. 
(Saussure 1983, 112; 
Saussure 1974, 113) 



As an example of the distinction between signification and value, Saussure notes that 
'The French word mouton may have the same meaning as the English word sheep; 
but it does not have the same value. There are various reasons for this, but in particular the 
fact that the English word for the meat of this animal, as prepared and served for a meal, is 
not sheep but mutton. The difference in value between sheep and 
mouton hinges on the fact that in English there is also another word mutton for 
the meat, whereas mouton in French covers both' 
(Saussure 1983, 114; 
Saussure 1974, 115-116). 


Saussure's relational conception of meaning was specifically differential: he 
emphasized the differences between signs. Language for him was a system of functional 
differences and oppositions. 
'In a language, as in every other semiological system, what distinguishes a sign is what 
constitutes it' 
(Saussure 1983, 119; 
Saussure 1974, 121). 
As John Sturrock points out, 'a one-term language is an impossibility because its single 
term could be applied to everything and differentiate nothing; it requires at least one 
other term to give it definition' 
(Sturrock 1979, 10). 
Advertising furnishes a good example of this notion, since what 
matters in 'positioning' a product is not the relationship of advertising signifiers to 
real-world referents, but the differentiation of each sign from the others to which it is 
related. Saussure's concept of the relational identity of signs is at the heart of structuralist 
theory. Structuralist analysis focuses on the structural relations which are functional in 
the signifying system at a particular moment in history. 'Relations are important for what they 
can explain: meaningful contrasts and permitted or forbidden combinations' 
(Culler 1975, 14). 


Saussure emphasized in particular negative, oppositional differences between signs, 
and the key relationships in structuralist analysis are binary oppositions (such as 
nature/culture, life/death). 
Saussure argued that 
'concepts... are defined not positively, in terms of their content, but negatively 
by contrast with other items in the same system. What characterizes each most exactly is 
being whatever the others are not' 
(Saussure 1983, 115; 
Saussure 1974, 117; my emphasis). 
This notion may initially seem mystifying if not perverse, but the concept of 
negative differentiation becomes clearer if we consider how we might teach 
someone who did not share our language what we mean by the term 'red'. 
We would be unlikely to make our point by simply showing them a range of different objects 
which all happened to be red - we would be probably do better to single out 
a red object from a sets of objects which were identical in all respects except colour. 
Although Saussure focuses on speech, he also noted that in writing, 
'the values of the letter are purely negative and differential' - 
all we need to be able to do is to distinguish one letter from another 
(Saussure 1983, 118; 
Saussure 1974, 119-120). 
As for his emphasis on negative differences, 
Saussure remarks that although both the signified and the signifier are purely differential and 
negative when considered separately, 
the sign in which they are combined is a positive term. He adds that 
'the moment we compare one sign with another as positive combinations, the term 
difference should be dropped... Two signs... 
are not different from each other, but only distinct. They are simply in opposition to 
each other. The entire mechanism of language... is based on oppositions of this kind and upon the 
phonic and conceptual differences they involve' 
(Saussure 1983, 119; 
Saussure 1974, 120-121). 


Although the signifier is treated by its users as 'standing for' the signified, 
Saussurean semioticians emphasize that there is no necessary, intrinsic, direct 
or inevitable relationship between the signifier and the signified. 

Saussure stressed the arbitrariness of the sign 
(Saussure 1983, 67, 78; 
Saussure 1974, 67, 78)  
- more specifically the arbitrariness of the link between the signifier and the signified 
(Saussure 1983, 67; 
Saussure 1974, 67). 

He was focusing on linguistic signs, seeing language as the most important sign system; 
for Saussure, the arbitrary nature of the sign was the first principle of language 
(Saussure 1983, 67; 
Saussure 1974, 67) - 
arbitrariness was identified later by Charles Hockett as a key 'design feature' of language 
(Hockett 1958; 
Hockett 1960; 
Hockett 1965). 
The feature of arbitrariness may indeed help to account for the extraordinary 
versatility of language 
(Lyons 1977, 71). 
In the context of natural language, Saussure 
stressed that there is no inherent, essential, 'transparent', self-evident 
or 'natural' connection between the signifier and the signified - 
between the sound or shape of a word and the concept to which it refers 
(Saussure 1983, 67, 68-69, 76, 111, 117; 
Saussure 1974, 67, 69, 76, 113, 119). 
Note that Saussure himself avoids directly relating the principle of arbitrariness to the 
relationship between language and an external world, but that subsequent commentators often do, 
and indeed, lurking behind the purely conceptual 'signified' one can often detect Saussure's 
allusion to real-world referents 
(Coward & Ellis 1977, 22). 
In language at least, the form of the signifier is not determined by what it 
signifies:  there is nothing 'treeish' about the word 'tree'. Languages differ, of course, in 
how they refer to the same referent. No specific signifier is 'naturally' more 
suited to a signified than any other signifier; in principle any signifier could represent 
any signified. Saussure observed that 
'there is nothing at all to prevent the association of any idea whatsoever with 
any sequence of sounds whatsoever' 
(Saussure 1983, 76; 
Saussure 1974, 76); 
'the process which selects one particular sound-sequence to correspond to one particular 
idea is completely arbitrary' 
(Saussure 1983, 111; 
Saussure 1974, 113). 


This principle of the arbitrariness of the linguistic sign was not an original conception: 
Aristotle had noted that 
'there can be no natural connection between the sound of any language and the things signified' 
(cited in Richards 1932, 32). In Plato's 
Cratylus Hermogenes urged Socrates to accept that 'whatever name you give to a thing 
is its right name; and if you give up that name and change it for another, the later name is no 
less correct than the earlier, just as we change the name of our servants; for I think no 
name belongs to a particular thing by nature' (cited in 
Harris 1987, 67). 
'That which we call a rose by any other name would smell as sweet', 
as Shakespeare put it. Whilst the notion of the arbitrariness of language was not new, but 
the emphasis which Saussure gave it can be seen as an original contribution, 
particularly in the context of a theory which bracketed the referent. 
Note that although Saussure prioritized speech, he also stressed that 
'the signs used in writing are arbitrary, The letter t, for instance, has no connection 
with the sound it denotes' 
(Saussure 1983, 117; 
Saussure 1974, 119). 


The arbitrariness principle can be applied not only to the sign, but to the 
whole sign-system. 
The fundamental arbitrariness of language is apparent from the observation that 

each language involves different distinctions between one signifier and 
another (e.g. 'tree' and 'free') and between one signified and another 
(e.g. 'tree' and 'bush'). The signified is clearly arbitrary if reality is perceived as a 
seamless continuum (which is how Saussure sees the initially undifferentiated realms of 
both thought and sound): where, for example, does a 'corner' end? 
Commonsense suggests that the existence of things in the world preceded 
our apparently simple application of 'labels' to them (a 'nomenclaturist' notion which 
Saussure rejected and to which we will return in due course). Saussure noted that 
'if words had the job of representing concepts fixed in advance, one would be able to find 
exact equivalents for them as between one language and another. But this is not the case' 
(Saussure 1983, 114-115; 
Saussure 1974, 116). 
Reality is divided up into arbitrary categories by every language and the 
conceptual world with which each of us is familiar could have been divided up 
very differently. Indeed, no two languages categorize reality in the 
same way. As John Passmore puts it, 'Languages differ by differentiating 
differently' (cited in 
Sturrock 1986, 17).
Linguistic categories are not simply a consequence of 
some predefined structure in the world. There are no 'natural' concepts or 
categories which are simply 'reflected' in language. 
Language plays a crucial role in 'constructing reality'. 



If one accepts the 
arbitrariness of the relationship between signifier and signified 
then one may argue counter-intuitively that the signified is determined 
by the signifier rather than vice versa. 
Indeed, the French psychoanalyst Jacques Lacan, in adapting Saussurean theories, sought to 
highlight the primacy of the signifier in the psyche by rewriting Saussure's model of the sign in the form of 
a quasi-algebraic sign in which a capital 'S' (representing the signifier) is placed over 
a lower case and italicized 's' (representing the signified), these two signifiers 
being separated by a horizontal 'bar' 
(Lacan 1977, 149). 
This suited Lacan's purpose of emphasizing how the signified inevitably 'slips beneath' the 
signifier, resisting our attempts to delimit it. Lacan poetically refers to Saussure's 
illustration of the planes of sound and thought as 'an image resembling the wavy lines of the 
upper and lower Waters in miniatures from manuscripts of Genesis; a double flux marked 
by streaks of rain', suggesting that this can be seen as illustrating the 'incessant sliding of 
the signified under the signifier' - although he argues that one should regard the dotted 
vertical lines not as 'segments of correspondence' but as 'anchoring points' (points de 
capiton - literally, the 'buttons' which anchor upholstery to furniture). However, he notes 
that this model is too linear, since 'there is in effect no signifying chain that does not have, 
as if attached to the punctuation of each of its units, a whole articulation of relevant contexts 
suspended 'vertically', as it were, from that point' 
(ibid., 154). 
In the spirit of the Lacanian critique of Saussure's model, subsequent theorists have 
emphasized the temporary nature of the bond between signifier and signified, stressing that 
the 'fixing' of 'the chain of signifiers' is socially situated 
(Coward & Ellis 1977, 6, 13, 17, 67). 
Note that whilst the intent of Lacan in placing the signifier over the signified 
is clear enough, his representational strategy seems a little 
curious, since in the modelling of society orthodox Marxists routinely represent the fundamental 
driving force of 'the [techno-economic] base' as (logically) below 'the 
[ideological] superstructure'. 


The arbitrariness of the sign is a radical concept because it proposes the autonomy of 
language in relation to reality. 
The Saussurean model, with its emphasis on internal structures within a sign system, can be 
seen as supporting the notion that language does not 'reflect' reality but rather 
constructs it. 
We can use language 'to say what isn't in the world, as well as what is. And since we come to 
know the world through whatever language we have been born into the midst of, it is legitimate 
to argue that our language determines reality, rather than reality our language' 
(Sturrock 1986, 79). 
In their book The Meaning of Meaning, Ogden and Richards criticized Saussure 
for 'neglecting entirely the things for which signs stand' 
(Ogden & Richards 1923, 8). 
Later critics have lamented his model's detachment from social context 
(Gardiner 1992, 11). Robert Stam 
argues that by 'bracketing the referent', the Saussurean model 'severs text from history' 
(Stam 2000, 122). We will return to this theme of 
the relationship between language and 'reality' in our discussion of 
'modality and representation'. 


The arbitrary aspect of signs does help to account for the scope for their interpretation 
(and the importance of context). There is no one-to-one link between 
signifier and signified; signs have multiple rather than single meanings. 
Within a single language, one signifier may refer to many signifieds (e.g. 
puns) and one signified may be referred to by many signifiers (e.g. 
synonyms). Some commentators are critical of the stance that the 
relationship of the signifier to the signified, even in language, 
is always completely arbitrary (e.g. 
Lewis 1991, 29). 
Onomatopoeic words are often mentioned in this context, though some 
semioticians retort that this hardly accounts for the variability 
between different languages in their words for the same sounds (notably 
the sounds made by familiar animals) 
(Saussure 1983, 69; 
Saussure 1974, 69). 


Saussure declares that 'the entire linguistic system is founded upon the irrational principle 
that the sign is arbitrary'. 
This provocative declaration is followed immediately by the acknowledgement 
that 'applied without restriction, this principle would lead to utter chaos' 
(Saussure 1983, 131; 
Saussure 1974, 133). 
If linguistic signs were to be totally arbitrary in every way language would not be a 
system and its communicative function would be destroyed. He concedes that 
'there exists no language in which nothing at all is motivated' 
(ibid.). Saussure admits that 
'a language is not completely arbitrary, for the system has a certain rationality' 
(Saussure 1983, 73; 
Saussure 1974, 73). 
The principle of arbitrariness does not mean that the form of a word is accidental or random, 
of course. Whilst the sign is not determined extralinguistically it is subject to 
intralinguistic determination. For instance, signifiers must constitute 
well-formed combinations of sounds which conform with existing patterns within the language in 
question. Furthermore, we can recognize that a compound noun such as 'screwdriver' is not 
wholly arbitrary since it is a meaningful combination of two existing signs. 
Saussure introduces a distinction between degrees of arbitrariness: 



The fundamental principle of the arbitrary nature of the linguistic sign does not prevent us 
from distinguishing in any language between what is intrinsically arbitrary - that is, 
unmotivated - and what is only relatively arbitrary. Not all signs are absolutely 
arbitrary. In some cases, there are factors which allow us to recognize different degrees of 
arbitrariness, although never to discard the notion entirely. The sign may be 
motivated to a certain extent 
(Saussure 1983, 130; 
Saussure 1974, 131; original emphasis, see also 
following pages)



Here then Saussure modifies his stance somewhat and refers to signs as being 'relatively 
arbitrary'. Some subsequent theorists (echoing 

Althusserian Marxist 
terminology) refer to the relationship between the signifier and the signified 
in terms of 'relative autonomy' 
(Tagg 1988, 167; 
Lechte 1994, 150). 
The relative conventionality of relationships 
between signified and signifier is a point to which I return below.


It should be noted that whilst the relationships between signifiers and their signifieds are 
ontologically arbitrary (philosophically, it would not make any difference to the status 
of these entities in 'the order of things' if what we call 'black' had always been called 
'white' and vice versa), this is not to suggest that signifying systems are 
socially or historically arbitrary. Natural languages are not, of course, 
arbitrarily established, unlike historical inventions such as Morse Code.  Nor does the 
arbitrary nature of the sign make it socially 'neutral' or materially 'transparent' - for 
example, in Western culture 'white' has come to be a privileged signifier 
(Dyer 1997). Even in the case of the 
'arbitrary' colours of traffic lights, the original choice of red for 'stop' was not 
entirely arbitrary, since it already carried relevant associations with danger.  
As Lévi-Strauss noted, the sign is arbitrary a priori but 
ceases to be arbitrary a posteriori - after the sign has come into 
historical existence it cannot be arbitrarily changed 
(Lévi-Strauss 1972, 91). 
As part of its social use within a  

code (a term which became fundamental amongst post-Saussurean semioticians), every sign 
acquires a history and 

connotations of its own which are familiar to members of the sign-users' culture. 
Saussure remarked that although the signifier 'may seem to be freely chosen', 
from the point of view of the linguistic community it is 'imposed rather than 
freely chosen' because 'a language is always an inheritance from the past' which its users 
have 'no choice but to accept' 
(Saussure 1983, 71-72; 
Saussure 1974, 71). Indeed, 
'it is because the linguistic sign is arbitrary that it knows no other law than that of 
tradition, and [it is] because it is founded upon tradition that it can be arbitrary' 
(Saussure 1983, 74; 
Saussure 1974, 74). 
The arbitrariness principle does not, of course mean that 
an individual can arbitrarily choose any signifier for a given signified. 
The relation between a signifier and its signified is not a matter of 
individual choice; if it were then communication would become impossible. 
'The individual has no power to alter a sign in any respect once it has 
become established in the linguistic community' 
(Saussure 1983, 68; 
Saussure 1974, 69). 
From the point-of-view of individual language-users, language is a 'given' - we don't 
create the system for ourselves. 
Saussure refers to the language system as a non-negotiable 'contract' into which one is born 
(Saussure 1983, 14; 
Saussure 1974, 14) - 
although he later problematizes the term (ibid., 71). 
The ontological arbitrariness which it involves becomes invisible to us 
as we learn to accept it as 'natural'. 


The Saussurean legacy of the arbitrariness of signs 
leads semioticians to stress that the relationship between the signifier and the 
signified is conventional - dependent on social and cultural conventions. This is 
particularly clear in the case of the linguistic signs with which Saussure was concerned: a word 
means what it does to us only because we collectively agree to let it do so. 
Saussure felt that the main concern of semiotics should be 'the whole group of systems 
grounded in the arbitrariness of the sign'. He argued that: 
'signs which are entirely arbitrary convey better than others the ideal semiological process. 
That is why the most complex and the most widespread of all systems of expression, which is 
the one we find in human languages, is also the most characteristic of all. In this sense, 
linguistics serves as a model for the whole of semiology, even though languages represent 
only one type of semiological system' 
(Saussure 1983, 68; 
Saussure 1974, 68). 
He did not in fact offer many examples of sign systems other than spoken language and writing,  
mentioning only: the deaf-and-dumb alphabet; social customs; etiquette; religious and other 
symbolic rites; legal procedures; military signals and nautical flags 
(Saussure 1983, 15, 17, 68, 74; 
Saussure 1974, 16, 17, 68, 73).
Saussure added that  
'any means of expression accepted in a society rests in principle upon a collective habit, or 
on convention - which comes to the same thing' 
(Saussure 1983, 68; 
Saussure 1974, 68). 
However, whilst purely conventional signs such as words are quite independent of their 
referents, other less conventional forms of signs are often somewhat less 
independent of them. Nevertheless, since the arbitary nature of 
linguistic signs is clear, those who have adopted the 
Saussurean model have tended to avoid 'the familiar mistake of assuming that signs which appear 
natural to those who use them have an intrinsic meaning and require no explanation' 
(Culler 1975, 5). 








At around the same time as Saussure was formulating his model of the sign, of 'semiology' 
and of a structuralist methodology, across the Atlantic independent work was also in progress 
as the pragmatist philosopher and logician Charles Sanders Peirce formulated his own 
model of the sign, of 'semiotic' and of the taxonomies of signs. 
In contrast to Saussure's model of the sign in the form of a 'self-contained dyad', Peirce 
offered a triadic model: 


The Representamen: the form which the sign takes 
(not necessarily material); 
An Interpretant: not an interpreter but rather the 
sense made of the sign;
An Object: to which the sign refers.



'A sign... [in the form of a representamen] is something which stands to somebody for 
something in some respect or capacity. It addresses somebody, that is, creates in the mind of 
that person an equivalent sign, or perhaps a more developed sign. That sign which it creates I 
call the interpretant of the first sign. The sign stands for something, its object. 
It stands for that object, not in all respects, but in reference to a sort of idea, which I have 
sometimes called the ground of the representamen' 
(Peirce 1931-58, 2.228). The interaction between 
the representamen, the object and the interpretant is referred to by 
Peirce as 'semiosis' 
(ibid., 5.484). 
Within Peirce's model of the sign, the traffic light sign for 'stop' would consist of: a red 
light facing traffic at an intersection (the representamen); vehicles halting (the object) and 
the idea that a red light indicates that vehicles must stop (the interpretant). 


Peirce's model of the sign includes an object or referent - which does not, of course, 
feature directly in Saussure's model. 
The representamen is similar in meaning to Saussure's signifier 
whilst the interpretant is similar in meaning to the signified
(Silverman 1983, 15). 
However, the interpretant has a quality unlike that of the signified: 
it is itself a sign in the mind of the interpreter. 
Peirce noted that 'a sign... addresses somebody, that is, creates in the mind of that 
person an equivalent sign, or perhaps a more developed sign. The sign which it creates I 
call the interpretant of the first sign' 
(Peirce 1931-58, 2.228). 

Umberto Eco uses the phrase 'unlimited semiosis' to refer to the way in which this could lead 
(as Peirce was well aware) to a series of successive interpretants (potentially) 
ad infinitum
(ibid., 1.339, 2.303). 
Elsewhere Peirce added that 'the meaning of a representation can be nothing but a representation' 
(ibid., 1.339). 
Any initial interpretation can be re-interpreted. 
That a signified can itself play the role of a signifier 
is familiar to anyone who uses a dictionary and finds themselves going beyond the original 
definition to look up yet another word which it employs. 
This concept can be seen as going beyond Saussure's emphasis on the value of 
a sign lying in its relation to other signs and it was 
later to be developed more radically by poststructuralist theorists. Another concept 
which is alluded to within Peirce's model which has been taken up by later theorists 
but which was explicitly excluded from Saussure's model is the notion of dialogical thought. 
It stems in part from Peirce's emphasis on 'semiosis' as a process 
which is in distinct contrast to Saussure's synchronic emphasis on structure
(Peirce 1931-58, 5.484, 5.488). 
Peirce argued that 'all thinking is dialogic in form. Your self of one instant appeals to 
your deeper self for his assent' 
(Peirce 1931-58, 6.338). This notion resurfaced 
in a more developed form in the 1920s in the theories of Mikhail Bakhtin 
(Bakhtin 1981). 
One important aspect of this 
is its characterization even of internal reflection as fundamentally social. 


Peirce, clearly fascinated by tripartite structures, made a 
phenomenological distinction between the sign itself [or the representamen] as an 
instance of 'Firstness', its object as an instance of 
'Secondness' and the interpretant as an instance of 'Thirdness'. 
Such unfamiliar terms are relatively modest examples of Peircean coinages, and the complexity of 
his terminology and style has been a factor in limiting the influence of a distinctively 
Peircean semiotics. 


Variants of Peirce's triad are often presented as 'the 
semiotic triangle' (as if there were only one version). Here is a version 
which is quite often encountered and which changes only the unfamiliar 
Peircean terms 
(Nöth 1990, 89): 






Sign vehicle: the form of the sign;
Sense: the sense made of the sign; 
Referent: what the sign 'stands for'. 



One fairly well-known semiotic triangle is that of Ogden and Richards, in which the 
terms used are (a) 'symbol', (b) 'thought or reference' and (c) 'referent' 
(Ogden & Richards 1923, 14). 
The broken line at the base of the triangle is intended to indicate that there is not  
necessarily any observable or direct relationship between the 
sign vehicle and the referent. Unlike Saussure's abstract signified (which is 
analogous to term B rather than to C) the 
referent is an 'object'. This need not exclude 
the reference of signs to abstract concepts and fictional entities as well as 
to physical things, but Peirce's model allocates a place for an objective 
reality which Saussure's model did not directly feature (though Peirce was not 
a naive realist, and argued that all experience is mediated by signs). 
Note, however, that Peirce emphasized that 'the dependence of the mode of 
existence of the thing represented upon the mode of this or that representation of it... 
is contrary to the nature of reality' 
(Peirce 1931-58, 5.323). 
The inclusion of a referent in Peirce's model does not automatically 
make it a better model of the sign than that of Saussure. Indeed, as John Lyons notes: 


There is considerable disagreement about the details of the triadic analysis even among those 
who accept that all three components, A, B and C, must be taken into 
account. Should A be defined as a physical or a mental entity? What is the psychological 
or ontological status of B? Is C something that is referred to on a particular 
occasion? Or is it the totality of things that might be referred to by uttering the sign...? Or, 
yet a third possibility, is it some typical or ideal representative of this class? 
(Lyons 1977, 99)



The notion of the importance of sense-making (which requires an 
interpreter - though Peirce doesn't feature that term in his triad)  
has had a particular appeal for communication and media theorists who stress the 
importance of the active process of interpretation, and thus reject 
the equation of 'content' and meaning. Many of these theorists allude 
to semiotic triangles in which the interpreter (or 'user') of the sign 
features explicitly (in place of 'sense' or 'interpretant'). 
This highlights the process of semiosis 
(which is very much a Peircean concept). The meaning of a sign is 
not contained within it, but arises in its interpretation. Whether a dyadic or triadic 
model is adopted, the role of the interpreter must be accounted for - 
either within the formal model of the sign, or as an essential part of 
the process of semiosis. David Sless declares that 'statements about users, 
signs or referents can never be made in isolation from each other. A statement 
about one always contains implications about the other two' 
(Sless 1986, 6). 
Paul Thibault argues that the interpreter features implicitly even 
within Saussure's apparently dyadic model 
(Thibault 1997, 184).


Note that semioticians make a distinction 
between a sign and a 'sign vehicle' (the latter being a 'signifier' to 
Saussureans and a 'representamen' to Peirceans). The sign is more than 
just a sign vehicle. The term 'sign' is often used 
loosely, so that this distinction is not always preserved. In the Saussurean framework, 
some references to 'the sign' should be to the signifier, 
and similarly, Peirce himself frequently mentions 'the sign' when, strictly speaking, he 
is referring to the representamen. It is easy to be found guilty of such a 
slippage, perhaps because we are so used to 'looking beyond' the form which the sign 
happens to take. However, to reiterate: the signifier 
or representamen is the form in which the sign appears (such as the 
spoken or written form of a word) whereas the sign is the whole meaningful 
ensemble. 


Whereas Saussure emphasized the arbitrary nature of the (linguistic) sign, 
most semioticians stress that signs differ in how arbitrary/conventional 
(or by contrast 'transparent') they are. Symbolism reflects only one form 
of relationship between signifiers and their signifieds. 
Whilst Saussure did not offer a typology of signs, Charles Peirce was a compulsive 
taxonomist and he offered several logical typologies 
(Peirce 1931-58, 1.291, 2.243). 
However, his divisions and subdivisions of signs are extraordinarily elaborate: 
indeed, he offered the theoretical projection that there could be 59,049 types of signs! 
Peirce himself noted 
wryly that this calculation 'threatens a multitude of classes too great to be conveniently 
carried in one's head', adding that 'we shall, I think, do well to postpone preparation for 
further divisions until there be a prospect of such a thing being wanted' 
(Peirce 1931-58, 1.291). However, even his 
more modest proposals are daunting: Susanne Langer commented that 
'there is but cold comfort in his assurance that his original 59,049 types can really be 
boiled down to a mere sixty-six' 
(Langer 1951, 56). 
Unfortunately, the complexity of such typologies rendered them 
'nearly useless' as working models for others in the field 
(Sturrock 1986, 17). 
However, one of Peirce's basic classifications (first outlined in 1867) has been very widely 
referred to in subsequent semiotic studies 
(Peirce 1931-58, 1.564). 
He regarded it as 'the most fundamental' division of signs 
(ibid., 2.275). 

It is less useful as a 
classification of distinct 'types of signs' than of differing 'modes of relationship' 
between sign vehicles and their referents 
(Hawkes 1977, 129).  
Note that in the subsequent account, I have continued to employ the Saussurean terms 
signifier and signified, even though Peirce referred to the relation 
between the 'sign' (sic) and the object, since the Peircean distinctions are 
most commonly employed within a broadly Saussurean framework. Such incorporation tends 
to emphasize (albeit indirectly) the referential potential of the signified within the 
Saussurean model. Here then are the three modes together with some brief definitions of 
my own and some illustrative examples: 






Symbol/symbolic: a mode in which the signifier does not resemble the signified but 
which is fundamentally arbitrary or purely conventional - so that the relationship must 
be learnt: e.g. language in general (plus specific languages, alphabetical letters, 
punctuation marks, words, phrases and sentences), numbers, morse code, traffic lights, 
national flags; 


Icon/iconic: a mode in which the signifier is perceived as resembling or 
imitating the signified (recognizably looking, sounding, feeling, tasting or smelling like it) - 
being similar in possessing some of its qualities: e.g. a portrait, a cartoon, a scale-model, 
onomatopoeia, metaphors, 'realistic' sounds in 'programme music', sound effects in radio drama, 
a dubbed film soundtrack, imitative gestures; 


Index/indexical: a mode in which the signifier is not arbitrary but is 
directly connected in some way 
(physically or causally) to the signified - this link can be observed or inferred: 
e.g. 'natural signs' (smoke, thunder, footprints, echoes, non-synthetic odours and 
flavours), medical symptoms (pain, a rash, pulse-rate), measuring instruments (weathercock, 
thermometer, clock, spirit-level), 'signals' (a knock on a door, a phone ringing), 
pointers (a pointing 'index' finger, a directional signpost), 
recordings (a photograph, a film, video or television shot, an 
audio-recorded voice), personal 'trademarks' (handwriting, catchphrase) and indexical words 
('that', 'this', 'here', 'there'). 




The three forms are listed here in decreasing order of 
conventionality. Symbolic signs such as language are (at least) highly conventional; iconic 
signs always involve some degree of conventionality; indexical signs 'direct the attention to 
their objects by blind compulsion' 
(Peirce 1931-58, 2.306). 
Indexical and iconic signifiers can be seen as more constrained by referential 
signifieds whereas in the more conventional symbolic signs the signified 
can be seen as being defined to a greater extent by the signifier. 
Within each form signs also vary in their degree of conventionality. Other criteria might 
be applied to rank the three forms differently. For instance, Hodge and Kress suggest that 
indexicality is based on an act of judgement or inference whereas iconicity is closer to 
'direct perception' making the highest 'modality' that of iconic 
signs. 

Note that the terms 'motivation' (from Saussure) and 'constraint' are sometimes used to describe 
the extent to which the signified determines the signifier. The more a signifier is 
constrained by the signified, the more 'motivated' the sign is: iconic signs are highly 
motivated; symbolic signs are unmotivated. The less motivated the sign, the more 
learning of an agreed convention is required. Nevertheless, 
most semioticians emphasize the role of convention in relation to signs. 
As  
we shall see, even photographs and films are built on conventions which we must learn 
to 'read'. Such conventions are an important social dimension of semiotics. 



Peirce and Saussure used the term 'symbol' differently from each other. Whilst nowadays 
most theorists would refer to language as a symbolic sign system, 
Saussure avoided referring to linguistic signs as 'symbols', since the 
ordinary everyday use of this term refers to examples such as a pair of scales (signifying 
justice), and he insisted that such signs are 
'never wholly arbitrary. They are not empty configurations'. They 'show at least a vestige of 
natural connection' between the signifier and the signified - a link which he later refers to 
as 'rational' 
(Saussure 1983, 68, 73; 
Saussure 1974, 68, 73). 
Whilst Saussure focused on the arbitrary nature of the linguistic sign, a more obvious example 
of arbitrary symbolism is mathematics. Mathematics does not need to refer to an 
external world at all: its signifieds are indisputably concepts and mathematics is a 
system of relations 
(Langer 1951, 28). 

 
For Peirce, a symbol is 
'a sign which refers to the object that it denotes by virtue of a law, usually an association 
of general ideas, which operates to cause the symbol to be interpreted as referring to that 
object' 
(Peirce 1931-58, 2.249). We interpret symbols 
according to 'a rule' or 'a habitual connection' 
(ibid., 2.292, 2.297, 1.369). 
'The symbol is connected with its object by virtue of the idea of the symbol-using animal, 
without which no such connection would exist' 
(ibid., 2.299). 
It 'is constituted a sign merely or mainly by the fact that it is used and understood as such' 
(ibid., 2.307). 
It 'would lose the character which renders it a sign if there were no interpretant' 
(ibid., 2.304). 
A symbol is 'a conventional sign, or one depending upon habit (acquired or inborn)' 
(ibid., 2.297). 
'All words, sentences, books and other conventional signs are symbols' 
(ibid., 2.292). 
Peirce thus characterizes linguistic signs in terms of their conventionality in a 
similar way to Saussure. In a rare direct reference to the arbitrariness of symbols (which he 
then called 'tokens'), he noted that they 'are, for the most part, conventional or arbitrary' 
(ibid., 3.360). 
A symbol is a sign 'whose special significance or fitness to represent just what it does 
represent lies in nothing but the very fact of there being a habit, disposition, or other 
effective general rule that it will be so interpreted. Take, for example, the word "man". 
These three letters are not in the least like a man; nor is the sound with which they are 
associated' (ibid., 4.447). He adds 
elsewhere that 'a symbol... fulfills its function regardless of any similarity or analogy 
with its object and equally regardless of any factual connection therewith' but 
solely because it will be interpreted as a sign 
(ibid., 5.73; original emphasis). 


Turning to icons, 
Peirce declared that an iconic sign represents its object 'mainly by its similarity' 
(Peirce 1931-58, 2.276).  
A sign is an icon 'insofar as it is like that thing and used as a sign of it' 
(ibid., 2.247). Indeed, he originally 
termed such modes, 'likenesses' 
(e.g. ibid., 1.558). 
He added that 'every picture (however conventional its method)' is an icon 
(ibid., 2.279). Icons have qualities which 
'resemble' those of the objects they represent, and they 'excite analogous sensations in the 
mind' 
(ibid., 2.299; see also 3.362). 
Unlike the index, 
'the icon has no dynamical connection with the object it represents' 
(ibid.). 
Just because a signifier resembles that which it depicts does not necessarily make it purely 
iconic. The philosopher Susanne Langer 
argues that 'the picture is essentially a symbol, not a duplicate, of what it represents' 
(Langer 1951, 67). 
Pictures resemble what they represent only in some respects. 
What we tend to recognize in an image are analogous relations of parts to a whole 
(ibid., 67-70). 
For Peirce, icons included 'every diagram, even although there be no sensuous resemblance 
between it and its object, but only an analogy between the relations of the parts of each' 
(Peirce 1931-58, 2.279). 
'Many diagrams resemble their objects not at all in looks; it is only in respect to the 
relations of their parts that their likeness consists' 
(ibid., 2.282). 
Even the most 'realistic' image is not a replica or even a copy of what is 
depicted. We rarely mistake a representation for what it represents. 


Semioticians generally maintain that there are no 'pure' icons - 
there is always an element of cultural convention involved. 
Peirce stated that although 'any material image' (such as a painting) may 
be perceived as looking like what it represents, it is 'largely conventional 
in its mode of representation' 
(Peirce 1931-58, 2.276). 
'We say that the portrait of a person we have not seen is convincing. So far as, 
on the ground merely of what I see in it, I am led to form an idea of the person it 
represents, it is an icon. But, in fact, it is not a pure icon, because I am greatly 
influenced by knowing that it is an effect, through the artist, caused by the 
original's appearance... Besides, I know that portraits have but the slightest 
resemblance to their originals, except in certain conventional respects, and after a 
conventional scale of values, etc.' 
(ibid., 2.92). 


Guy Cook asks whether the iconic sign on the door of a public 
lavatory for men actually looks more like a man than like a woman. 
'For a sign to be truly iconic, it would have to be transparent to someone 
who had never seen it before - and it seems unlikely that this is as much 
the case as is sometimes supposed. We see the resemblance when we already 
know the meaning' 
(Cook 1992, 70). 
Thus, even a 'realistic' picture is symbolic as well as iconic. 


Iconic and indexical signs are more likely to be read as 'natural' than 
symbolic signs when making the connection between signifier and signified has 
become habitual. 
Iconic signifiers can be highly evocative. Kent Grayson observes: 
'Because we can see the object in the sign, we are often left with a sense 
that the icon has brought us closer to the truth than if we had instead seen 
an index or a symbol' 
(Grayson 1998, 36). 
He adds that 'instead of drawing our attention to the gaps that 
always exist in representation, iconic experiences encourage us 
subconsciously to fill in these gaps and then to believe that there were no 
gaps in the first place... This is the paradox of representation: it may deceive 
most when we think it works best' 
(ibid., 41). 


The linguist John Lyons notes that iconicity is 'always dependent upon properties of the medium 
in which the form is manifest' 
(Lyons 1977, 105). He offers the example of the 
onomatopoeic English word cuckoo, noting that it is only iconic in the phonic medium 
(speech) and not in the graphic medium (writing). Whilst the phonic medium can represent 
characteristic sounds (albeit in a relatively conventionalized way), the graphic medium 
can represent characteristic shapes (as in the case of Egyptian hieroglyphs) 
(Lyons 1977, 103). 
We will return shortly to the 
importance of the materiality of the sign. 

Indexicality is perhaps the most unfamiliar concept. Peirce offers various 
criteria for what constitutes an index. An index 'indicates' something: for example, 
'a sundial or clock indicates the time of day' 
(Peirce 1931-58, 2.285). 
He refers to a 'genuine relation' between the 'sign' and the object which does not 
depend purely on 'the interpreting mind' 
(ibid., 2.92, 298). 
The object is 'necessarily existent' 
(ibid., 2.310). The index is 
connected to its object 'as a matter of fact' 
(ibid., 4.447). There is 'a real 
connection' 
(ibid., 5.75). 
There may be a 'direct physical connection' 
(ibid., 1.372, 2.281, 2.299). 
An indexical sign is like 'a fragment torn away from the object' 
(ibid., 2.231). 
Unlike an icon (the object of which may be fictional) an index stands 'unequivocally for this 
or that existing thing' 
(ibid., 4.531). 
Whilst 'it necessarily has some quality in common' with it, the signifier is 
'really affected' by the signified; there is an 'actual modification' involved 
(ibid., 2.248). 
The relationship is not based on 'mere resemblance' 
(ibid.): 
'indices... have no significant resemblance to their objects' 
(ibid., 2.306). 'Similarity 
or analogy' are not what define the index 
(ibid., 2.305). 
'Anything which focusses the attention is an index. Anything which startles us is 
an index' 
(ibid., 2.285; see also 3.434). 
Indexical signs 
'direct the attention to their objects by blind compulsion' 
(ibid., 2.306; see also 2.191, 2.428). 
'Psychologically, the action of indices depends upon association by contiguity, and not upon 
association by resemblance or upon intellectual operations' 
(ibid.). 


Whilst a photograph is also perceived as resembling that which it depicts, 
Peirce noted that a photograph is not only iconic but also indexical: 
'photographs, especially instantaneous photographs, are very instructive, 
because we know that in certain respects they are exactly like the objects they 
represent. But this resemblance is due to the photographs having been produced 
under such circumstances that they were physically forced to correspond point 
by point to nature. In that aspect, then, they belong to the... class of signs... 
by physical connection [the indexical class]' 
(Peirce 1931-58, 2.281; see also 5.554). 
So in this sense, since the photographic image is an index of the effect of light on 
photographic emulsion, all unedited photographic and filmic images are indexical 
(although we should remember that conventional practices are always involved in 
composition, focusing, developing and so on). 
Such images do of course 'resemble' what they depict, and it has been suggested 
the 'real force' of the photographic and filmic image 'lies in its iconic signification' 
(Deacon et al. 1999, 188). 
However, whilst digital imaging techniques are increasingly eroding the indexicality of 
photographic images, it is arguable that it is the indexicality still routinely attributed to 
the medium which is primarily responsible for interpreters treating them as 'objective' 
records of 'reality'. Peirce observed that 'a photograph... owing to its optical connection 
with its object, is evidence that that appearance corresponds to a reality' 
(Peirce 1931-58, 4.447). In many contexts 
photographs are indeed regarded as 'evidence', not least in legal contexts. As for the moving 
image, video-cameras are of course widely used 'in evidence'. 
Documentary film and location footage in television news programmes depend upon the indexical 
nature of the sign. In such genres indexicality seems to warrant the status of the 
material as evidence. 
Photographic and filmic images may also be symbolic: in an 
empirical study of television news, Davis and Walton found that 
A relatively small proportion of the total number of shots is iconic 
or directly representative of the people, places and events 
which are subjects of the news text. A far greater proportion of shots 
has an oblique relationship to the text; they 'stand for' the subject 
matter indexically or symbolically 
(Davis & Walton 1983b, 45). 


It is easy to slip into referring to Peirce's three forms as 'types of signs', 
but they are not necessarily mutually exclusive: a sign can be 
an icon, a symbol and an index, or any combination. Peirce was fully aware of this: 
for instance, he insisted that 'it would be difficult if not impossible to instance an 
absolutely pure index, or to find any sign absolutely devoid of the indexical quality' 
(Peirce 1931-58, 2.306). A map is indexical in 
pointing to the locations of things, iconic in its representation of the directional relations 
and distances between landmarks and symbolic in using conventional symbols 
the significance of which must be learnt. 
The film theorist Peter Wollen argues that 'the great merit of Peirce's analysis of signs 
is that he did not see the different aspects as mutually exclusive. Unlike Saussure he did not 
show any particular prejudice in favour of one or the other. Indeed, he wanted a logic and a 
rhetoric which would be based on all three aspects' 
(Wollen 1969, 141). 
Film and television use all three forms: 
icon (sound and image), symbol (speech and writing), and index (as the effect 
of what is filmed); at first sight iconic signs seem the dominant form, 
but some filmic signs are fairly arbitrary, such as 'dissolves' which signify 
that a scene from someone's memory is to follow. 


Hawkes notes, following Jakobson, 
that the three modes 'co-exist in the form of a hierarchy in which one 
of them will inevitably have dominance over the other two', with dominance determined by 
context (Hawkes 1977, 129). 
Whether a sign is symbolic, iconic or indexical depends primarily on the way in which the sign 
is used, so textbook examples chosen to illustrate the various modes can be misleading. 
The same signifier may be used iconically in one context and symbolically in 
another: a photograph of a woman may stand for some broad category such as 
'women' or may more specifically represent only the particular woman who is 
depicted. 
Signs cannot be classified in terms of the three modes without 
reference to the purposes of their users within particular contexts. 
A sign may consequently be treated as symbolic by one person, as iconic by 
another and as indexical by a third. As Kent Grayson puts it, 
'When we speak of an icon, an index or a symbol, we are not referring to 
objective qualities of the sign itself, but to a viewer's experience of the 
sign' 
(Grayson 1998, 35). 
 Signs may also shift in mode over time. 
As Jonathan Culler notes, 'In one sense a Rolls-Royce is an index of wealth in that 
one must be wealthy in order to purchase one, but it has been made a conventional sign of 
wealth by social usage' 
(Culler 1975, 17). 


Despite his emphasis on studying 'the language-state' 'synchronically' 
(as if it were frozen at one moment in time) rather than 'diachronically' 
(studying its evolution), Saussure was well aware that the relationship between the 
signified and the signifier in language was subject to change over time 
(Saussure 1983, 74ff; 
Saussure 1974, 74ff). However, this was not the 
focus of his concern. 
Critics of structuralist approaches emphasize that the relation between signifier and signified 
is subject to dynamic change: Rosalind Coward and John Ellis argue that 
any 'fixing' of 'the chain of signifiers' - is both temporary and socially determined 
(Coward & Ellis 1977, 6, 8, 13). 


In terms of Peirce's three modes, a historical shift from one mode to another tends to occur. 
Although Peirce made far more allowance for non-linguistic signs than 
did Saussure, like Saussure, he too granted greater status to symbolic signs: 
'they are the only general signs; and generality is essential to reasoning' 
(Peirce 1931-58, 3.363; see also 4.448 & 4.531). 
Saussure's emphasis on the importance of the principle of arbitrariness reflects his 
prioritizing of symbolic signs whilst Peirce referred to Homo sapiens as 
'the symbol-using animal' 
(Peirce 1931-58, 2.299). The idea of 
the evolution of sign-systems towards the symbolic mode is consistent with such a 
perspective.  Peirce speculates 'whether there be a life in signs, so that 
- the requisite vehicle being present - they will go through a certain order of 
development'. Interestingly, he does not present this as necessarily a matter of 
progress towards the 'ideal' of symbolic form since he allows for the theoretical possibility 
that 'the same round of changes of form is described over and over again' 
(ibid., 2.111). Whilst granting such 
a possibility, he nevertheless notes that 'a regular progression... may be 
remarked in the three orders of signs, Icon, Index, Symbol' 
(ibid., 2.299). 
Peirce posits iconicity as the original default mode of signification, declaring 
the icon to be 'an originalian sign' 
(ibid., 2.92), defining this 
as 'the most primitive, simple and original of the categories' 
(ibid., 2.90). Compared to 
the 'genuine sign... or symbol', an index is 'degenerate in the lesser degree' whilst 
an icon is 'degenerate in the greater degree'. Peirce noted 
that signs were 'originally in part iconic, in part indexical' 
(ibid., 2.92). He adds that 
'in all primitive writing, such as the Egyptian hieroglyphics, there are icons 
of a non-logical kind, the ideographs' and he speculates that 
'in the earliest form of speech there probably was a large element of mimicry' 
(ibid., 2.280). 
However, over time, linguistic signs developed a more symbolic and conventional character 
(ibid., 2.92, 2.280). 
'Symbols come into being by development out of other signs, particularly from icons' 
(ibid., 2.302). 


The historical evidence does indicate a tendency of linguistic signs to evolve from 
indexical and iconic forms towards symbolic forms. 
Alphabets were not initially based on the substitution of conventional 
symbols for sounds. Marcel Danesi notes that 
'archaeological research suggests... that the origins of alphabetical writing lie in 
symbols previously made out of elemental shapes that were used as image-making objects - 
much like the moulds that figurine and coin-makers use today. Only later did they 
take on more abstract qualities' 
(Danesi 1999, 35; see 
Schmandt-Besserat 1978). 
Some of the letters in the Greek and Latin alphabets, of course, derive from iconic signs in 
Egyptian hieroglyphs. 
The early scripts of the Mediterranean civilizations used pictographs, ideographs and 
hieroglyphs. Many of these were iconic signs resembling the objects and actions to which they 
referred either directly or metaphorically. Over time, picture writing 
became more symbolic and less iconic 
(Gelb 1963). 
This shift from the iconic to the symbolic may have been 'dictated by the economy of 
using a chisel or a reed brush' (Cherry 1966, 33); 
in general, symbols are semiotically more flexible and efficient 
(Lyons 1977, 103). 
The anthropologist Claude Lévi-Strauss identified a similar general movement from motivation 
to arbitrariness within the conceptual schemes employed by particular cultures 
(Lévi-Strauss 1974, 156). 


Taking a historical perspective is one reason for the insistence of some theorists that 
'signs are never arbitrary' 
(Kress & van Leeuwen 1996, 7). 
Gunther Kress, for instance, 
emphasizes the motivation of the sign users rather than of the sign (see also 
Hodge & Kress 1988, 21-2). 
Rosalind Coward and John Ellis insist that 'every identity between signifier and signified 
is the result of productivity and a work of limiting that productivity' 
(Coward & Ellis 1977, 7). 



A distinction is sometimes made between digital and analogical 
signs. Indeed, Anthony Wilden declares that 'no two categories, and no two kinds of experience 
are more fundamental in human life and thought than continuity and discontinuity' 
(Wilden 1987, 222). 
Whilst we experience time as a continuum, we may represent it in either analogue or 
digital form. A watch with an analogue display (with hour, minute and second hands) has the 
advantage of dividing an hour up like a cake (so that, in a lecture, for instance, we can 'see' 
how much time is left). A watch with a digital display (displaying the current time as a 
changing number) has the advantage of precision, so that we can easily see exactly what time it 
is 'now'. Even an analogue display is now simulated on some digital watches. 


We have a deep attachment to analogical modes and we tend to regard digital representations 
as 'less real' or 'less authentic' - at least initially (as in the case of the audio CD 
compared to the vinyl LP). The analogue/digital distinction is frequently represented as 
'natural' versus 'artificial'. Perhaps this is connected in part with the notion that the 
unconscious - that which we regard as 'deepest' within us - appears to operate analogically 
(Wilden 1987, 224). The privileging of the 
analogical may be linked with 
the status of the unconscious and the defiance of rationality in romantic ideology 
(which still dominates our conception of ourselves as 'individuals'). 
The deliberate intention to communicate tends to be dominant in digital codes, whilst 
in analogue codes 'it is almost impossible... not to communicate' 
(ibid., 225). Beyond any conscious intention, 
we communicate through gesture, posture, facial expression, intonation and so on. 
Analogical codes unavoidably 'give us away', revealing such things as our moods, attitudes, 
intentions and truthfulness (or otherwise). However, 
although the appearance of the 'digital watch' in 1971 and the subsequent 'digital revolution' in 
audio- and video-recording have led us to associate the digital mode with electronic 
technologies, digital codes have existed since the earliest forms of 
language - and writing is a 'digital technology'. Signifying systems impose digital order on what 
we often experience as a dynamic and seamless flux. The very definition of something as a sign 
involves reducing the continuous to the discrete. 
As we shall see later, binary 
(either/or) distinctions are a fundamental process in the creation of signifying 
structures. Digital signs involve discrete units such as words and 'whole numbers' and depend on 
the categorization of what is signified. 


Analogical signs (such as visual images, gestures, 
textures, tastes and smells) involve graded relationships on a continuum. They can signify 
infinite subtleties which seem 'beyond words'. Emotions and feelings are analogical 
signifieds. Unlike symbolic signifiers, 
motivated signifiers (and their signifieds) blend into one another. 
There can be no comprehensive catalogue of such dynamic analogue signs as smiles or laughs. 
Analogue signs can of course be digitally reproduced (as 
is demonstrated by the digital recording of sounds and of both still and moving images) 
but they cannot be directly related to a standard 'dictionary' 
and syntax in the way that linguistic signs can. 
Bill Nichols notes that 'the graded quality of analogue codes may make them rich in meaning 
but it also renders them somewhat impoverished in syntactical complexity or semantic 
precision. By contrast the discrete units of digital codes may be somewhat impoverished in 
meaning but capable of much greater complexity or semantic signification' 
(Nichols 1981, 47; see also 
Wilden 1987, 138, 224). 
The art historian 
Ernst Gombrich insists that 'statements cannot be translated into images'   
and that 'pictures cannot assert' - a contention also found in Peirce 
(Gombrich 1982, 138, 175; 
Peirce 1931-58, 2.291). 
Nevertheless, whilst images serving such communicative purposes may be more 'open to 
interpretation', contemporary visual advertisements are a powerful example of how images may be 
used to make implicit claims which advertisers often prefer not to 
make more openly in words. 


The Italian semiotician Umberto Eco has criticized the apparent 
equation of the terms 'arbitrary', 'conventional' and 'digital' by some 
commentators. He notes the way in which the following widespread pairings 
misleadingly suggest that the terms vertically aligned here are synonymous 
(Eco 1976, 190). 
He observes, for instance, that a photograph may be both 'motivated' and 
'digital'. Nor is 'conventionality' (dependence on social and cultural conventions) 
equivalent to 'arbitrariness' (the lack of any intrinsic connection between the 
signifier and the signified). Yet it is easy to slip into treating such terms as 
equivalent - the current text far from immune to this. We may, as we shall see later, 
be so fond of analogy that we are often (perhaps 
unavoidably) its unwitting victims. 




digitalvs.analogical

arbitaryvs.motivated

conventionalvs.natural





Another distinction between sign vehicles relates to the linguistic concept of tokens and 
types which derives from Peirce 
(Peirce 1931-58, 4.537). 
In relation to words in a spoken utterance or written text, 
a count of the tokens would be a count of the total number of words used (regardless of type), 
whilst a count of the types would be a count of the different words used, ignoring 
repetitions. In the language of 
semantics, tokens instantiate (are instances of) their type. 
'Word' and 'word' are instances of the same type. Language depends on 
the distinction between tokens and types, between the particular instance and the 
general category. This is the basis of categorization. 
John Lyons notes that 
whether something is counted as a token of a type is relative to one's purposes - 
for instance: 


Are tokens to include words with different meanings which happen to be spelt or 
pronounced in the same way? 
Does a capital letter instantiate the same type as the corresponding lower-case letter?
Does a word printed in italics instantiate the same type as a word printed in Roman?
Is a word handwritten by X ever the same as a word handwritten by Y?

(Lyons 1977, 13-15)



From a semiotic point-of-view, such questions could only be answered by considering in each 
case whether the different forms signified something of any consequence to the relevant 
sign-users in the context of the specific signifying practice being studied. 


Eco lists three kinds of sign vehicles, and it is notable that the 
distinction relates in part at least to material form: 


signs in which there may be any number of tokens (replicas) 
of the same type (e.g. a printed word, or exactly the same model of car in the same colour); 
'signs whose tokens, even though produced according to a type, possess a 
certain quality of material uniqueness' (e.g. a word which someone speaks or 
which is handwritten); 
'signs whose token is their type, or signs in which type and token are 
identical' (e.g. a unique original oil-painting or Princess Diana's wedding dress). 

(Eco 1976, 178ff)



The type-token distinction may influence the way in which a text 
is interpreted. In his influential essay on 'The Work of Art in the Age of Mechanical 
Reproduction', the literary-philosophical theorist Walter Benjamin (1892-1940) 
noted that technological society is dominated by reproductions of original works - 
tokens of the original type 

(Benjamin 1992, 211-244). Indeed, even if we do see, for instance, 
'the original' of a famous 
oil-painting, we are highly likely to have seen it first in the form of 
innumerable reproductions (books, postcards, posters - sometimes even in 
the form of pastiches or variations on the theme) and we may only be able 
to 'see' the original in the light of the judgements shaped by  
the copies or versions which we have encountered (see 

Intertextuality). In the postmodern era, the bulk of our 
texts are indeed 'copies without originals'. 


The type-token distinction in relation to signs is important 
in social semiotic terms not as an absolute property of the sign vehicle 
but only insofar as it matters on any given occasion (for particular 
purposes) to those involved in using the sign. Minute 
differences in a pattern could be a matter of life and death for 
gamblers in relation to variations in the pattern on the backs of 
playing-cards within the same pack, but stylistic differences in the 
design of each type of card (such as the Ace of Spades), are much 
appreciated by collectors as a distinctive feature of different packs of 
playing-cards. 


As already indicated, Saussure saw both the signifier and the signified as non-material 
'psychological' forms; the language itself is 'a form, not a substance' 
(Saussure 1983, 111, 120; 
Saussure 1974, 113, 122). 
He uses several examples to reinforce his point. For instance, 
in one of several chess analogies, he notes that 
'if pieces made of ivory are substituted for pieces made of wood, the change makes no 
difference to the system' 
(Saussure 1983, 23; 
Saussure 1974, 22). Pursuing this functional  
approach, he notes elsewhere that the 8.25pm Geneva-to-Paris train is referred to 
as 'the same train' even though the combinations of locomotive, carriages and personnel may 
change. Similarly, he asks why a street which is completely rebuilt can still be 'the same 
street'. He suggests that this is 'because it is not a purely material structure' 
(Saussure 1983, 107; 
Saussure 1974, 108). 
Saussure insists that this is not to say that such entities are 'abstract' since we cannot 
conceive of a street or train outside of its material realization - 
'their physical existence is essential to our understanding of what they are' 
(Saussure 1983, 107;  
Saussure 1974, 109; see also ibid, 15). 
This can be related to the type-token distinction. Since Saussure sees language in terms of 
formal function rather than material substance, then whatever performs the same function 
within the system can be regarded as just another token of the same type. 
With regard to language, Saussure observes that 'sound, as a material element... is merely 
ancillary, a material the language uses' 
(Saussure 1983, 116; 
Saussure 1974, 118). 
Linguistic signifiers are 
'not physical in any way. They are constituted solely by differences which distinguish one such 
sound pattern from another' 
(Saussure 1983, 117; 
Saussure 1974, 118-119). He admits at one point, 
with some apparent reluctance, that 
'linguistic signs are, so to speak, tangible: writing can fix them in conventional images' 
(Saussure 1983, 15; 
Saussure 1974, 15). 
However, referring to written signs, he comments that 
'the actual mode of inscription is irrelevant, because it does not affect the system... 
Whether I write in black or white, in incised characters or in relief, with a pen or a 
chisel - none of that is of any importance for the meaning' 
(Saussure 1983, 118; 
Saussure 1974, 120). One can understand how a 
linguist would tend to focus on form and function within language and to regard the 
material manifestations of language as of peripheral interest. 'The linguist... is interested 
in types, not tokens' 
(Lyons 1977, 28). 


This was not only the attitude of the linguist Saussure, but also of the philosopher Peirce: 
'The word "man"... does not consist of three films of ink. If the word "man" occurs 
hundreds of times in a book of which myriads of copies are printed, all those millions of 
triplets of patches of ink are embodiments of one and the same word... each of those 
embodiments a replica of the symbol. This shows that the word is not a thing' 
(Peirce 1931-58, 4.447). 
Peirce did refer to the materiality of the sign: 'since a sign is not identical 
with the thing signified, but differs from the latter in some respects, it must plainly 
have some characters which belong to it in itself... These I call the material 
qualities of the sign'. He granted that materiality is a property of the sign which is 'of great 
importance in the theory of cognition'. Materiality had 'nothing to do with its representative 
function' and it did not feature in his classificatory schemes. However, he alludes briefly to 
the signifying potential of materiality: 'if I take all the things which 
have certain qualities and physically connect them with another series of things, each to 
each, they become fit to be signs'. For instance, if the colour of a red flower matters to 
someone then redness is a sign 
(ibid., 5.287). 


Whilst Saussure chose to ignore the materiality of the linguistic sign, most subsequent 
theorists who have adopted his model have chosen to reclaim the materiality of the sign 
(or more strictly of the signifier). 
Semioticians must take seriously any factors to which sign-users ascribe significance, 
and the material form of a sign does sometimes make a difference. 
Contemporary theorists tend to acknowledge that the material form of the sign 
may generate 

connotations of its own. 
As early as 1929 Valentin Voloshinov published Marxism and the Philosophy of 
Language which included a materialist critique of Saussure's 
psychological and implicitly idealist model of the sign. Voloshinov described 
Saussure's ideas as 'the most striking expression' of 'abstract objectivism' 
(Voloshinov 1973, 58). He insisted that 
'a sign is a phenomenon of the external world' and that  
'signs... are particular, material things'. Every sign 'has some kind of material 
embodiment, whether in sound, physical mass, colour, movements of the body, or the like' 
(ibid., 10-11; cf. 28). 
For Voloshinov, all signs, including language, have 'concrete material reality' 
(ibid., 65) and the physical 
properties of the sign matter. 


Psychoanalytic theory also contributed to the revaluation of the signifier - 
in Freudian dream theory the sound of the signifier could be regarded as a better guide to 
its possible signified than any conventional 'decoding' might have suggested 
(Freud 1938, 319). For instance, Freud reported 
that the dream of a young woman engaged to be married featured flowers - including 
lilies-of-the-valley and violets. Popular symbolism suggested that the lilies were a symbol of 
chastity and the woman agreed that she associated them with purity. However, 
Freud was surprised to discover that she associated the word 'violet' phonetically 
with the English word 'violate', suggesting her fear of the violence of 'defloration' 
(another word alluding to flowers) 
(Freud 1938, 382-3). If this sounds familiar, 
this particular dream motif featured in the film Final Analysis (1992). 


As the psychoanalytical theorist Jacques Lacan emphasized (originally in 1957), the Freudian 
concepts of condensation and displacement illustrate the 
determination of the signified by the signifier in dreams 
(Lacan 1977, 159ff). 
In condensation, several thoughts 
are condensed into one symbol, whilst in displacement unconscious desire is 
displaced into an apparently trivial symbol (to avoid dream censorship). 


Poststructuralist theorists have sought to revalorize the 
signifier. The phonocentrism which was allied with Saussure's suppression of the materiality of 
the linguistic sign was challenged in 1967, when the French poststructuralist Jacques Derrida, in his book 
Of Grammatology, attacked the privileging of speech over writing which is 
found in Saussure (as well as in the work of many other previous and subsequent linguists) 
(Derrida 1976). 
From Plato to Lévi-Strauss, the spoken word had held a privileged position in the 
Western worldview, being regarded as intimately involved in our sense of self 
and constituting a sign of truth and authenticity. 
Speech had become so thoroughly naturalized that 'not only do the signifier and the signified 
seem to unite, but also, in this 
confusion, the signifier seems to erase itself or to become transparent' 
(Derrida 1981, 22). 
Writing had traditionally been relegated to a secondary position. 
The deconstructive enterprise marked 'the return of the repressed' 
(Derrida 1978, 197). In seeking to establish 
'Grammatology' or the study of textuality, Derrida championed the primacy of the material word. 
He noted that the specificity of words is itself a material dimension. 
'The materiality of a word cannot be translated or carried over 
into another language. Materiality is precisely that which translation relinquishes' - 
this English translation presumably illustrating some such loss 
(ibid., 210). 
Roland Barthes also sought to revalorize the role of the signifier in the act of writing. 
He argued that in 'classic' literary writing, the writer 'is always supposed 
to go from signified to signifier, from content to form, from idea to text, from passion to 
expression' 
(Barthes 1974, 174). However, this was directly 
opposite to the way in which Barthes characterized the act of writing. For him, 
writing was a matter of working with the signifiers and letting the signifieds take care of 
themselves - a paradoxical phenomenon which other writers have often reported 
(Chandler 1995, 60ff). 
Subsequent theorists have also sought to 'rematerialize' the linguistic sign, stressing that 
words are things and that texts are part of the material world 
(e.g. 
Coward & Ellis 1977; 
Silverman & Torode 1980). 


Jay David Bolter argues that 'signs are always anchored in a medium. 
Signs may be more or less dependent upon the characteristics of one 
medium - they may transfer more or less well to other media - but there is 
no such thing as a sign without a medium' 
(Bolter 1991, 195-6). This is 
a little misleading, because, as Justin Lewis notes, 'the sign has 
no material existence, since meaning is brought to words or objects, 
not inscribed within them. Only the signifier - the unit prior 
to meaning - exists as a material entity' 
(Wren-Lewis 1983, 181). 
Nevertheless, Bolter's point does apply to the sign vehicle, 
and as Hodge and Tripp note, 'fundamental to all semiotic analysis 
is the fact that any system of signs (semiotic 

code) is carried by a material medium which has 
its own principles of structure' 
(Hodge & Tripp 1986, 17). 
Furthermore, some media draw on several interacting sign systems: 
television and film, for example, utilize verbal, visual, auditory and 
locomotive signs. 


The medium is not 'neutral'; each medium has its own constraints and, 
as Umberto Eco notes, each is already 'charged with cultural 
signification' (Eco 1976, 267). For instance, 
photographic and audio-visual media are almost invariably regarded as more 'real' 
than other forms of representation. Gunther Kress and Theo van Leeuwen argue that 
'the material expression of the text is always significant; it is a separately 
variable semiotic feature' 
(Kress & van Leeuwen 1996, 231). 
Changing the signifier at the level of the form or medium may thus influence the 
signified - the sense which readers make of what is ostensibly the same 'content'. Breaking up 
a relationship by fax is likely to be regarded in a different light from 
breaking up in a face-to-face situation. 


I have alluded to the problematic distinction between form and content. 
The linguist Louis Hjelmslev acknowledged that 
'there can be no content without an expression, or expressionless content; neither can there be 
an expression without a content, or content-less expression' 
(Hjelmslev 1961, 49). However, he 
offered a framework which facilitated analytical distinctions 
(ibid., 47ff). 
Whilst he referred to 'planes' of expression and content (Saussure's signifier and 
signified), he enriched this model 
(ibid., 60). His contribution was to 
suggest that both expression and content have substance and form. 
Thus there are four categories: substance of expression, form of expression, substance of 
content, form of content. Various theorists such as Christian Metz have built upon this 
theoretical distinction and they differ somewhat in what they assign to the four categories 
(see Tudor 1974, 110; 
Baggaley & Duck 1976, 149; 
Metz 1981). 



Substance
Form

Signifiers: plane of expression
Substance of expression:physical materials of 
the medium (e.g. photographs, recorded voices, printed words on paper)
Form of expression:language, formal syntactic structure, 
technique and style 

Signifieds: plane of content
Substance of content:'human content' (Metz), 
textual world, subject matter, genre 
Form of content:'semantic structure' (Baggaley & 
Duck), 'thematic structure' (including narrative) (Metz)




Whereas Saussure had insisted that language is 'a form, not a substance', Hjelmslev's 
framework allows us to analyse texts according to their various dimensions  and to grant to 
each of these the potential for signification. Such a matrix provides a useful framework for the 
systematic analysis of texts, broadens the notion of what constitutes a sign, and reminds us 
that the materiality of the sign may in itself signify. 


From an explicitly social semiotic perspective, Gunther Kress and Theo 
van Leeuwen adapt a linguistic model from Michael Halliday and insist that any 
semiotic system has three essential metafunctions:


the ideational metafunction - 'to represent, in a referential or 
pseudo-referential sense, aspects of the experiential world outside its 
particular system of signs'; 
the interpersonal metafunction - 'to project the relations between 
the producer of a sign... and the receiver/reproducer of that sign'; and
the textual metafunction - 'to form texts, complexes of signs which 
cohere both internally and within the context in and for which they were 
produced'. 
(Kress & van Leeuwen 1996, 40-41)



Specific semiotic systems are called

codes.








Contents


Contents Page
Preface
Introduction
Signs
Modality and representation
Paradigms and syntagms
Syntagmatic analysis
Paradigmatic analysis
Denotation, connotation and myth
Rhetorical tropes
Codes
Modes of address
Encoding/Decoding
Articulation
Intertextuality
Criticisms of semiotic analysis
Strengths of semiotic analysis
D.I.Y. semiotic analysis
Glossary of key terms
Suggested reading
References
Index



















Saussure's Sign

























Saussure's Sign

By Steve Hoenisch
Copyright 1996-2015 www.Criticism.Com

Table of Contents
1 THE SIGN, THE SIGNIFIER, AND THE SIGNIFIED
2 LEXICON
3 SIGN VS. SYMBOL
4 MISTAKES
5 EXPANSION BEYOND LANGUAGE
6 A FINAL WORD: THE INDETERMINANCY OF MEANING
7 REFERENCES
8 RELATED


1 THE SIGN, THE SIGNIFIER, AND THE SIGNIFIED
The sign, the signifier, and the signified are concepts of the school of thought known as structuralism, founded by Ferdinand de Saussure, a Swiss linguist, during lectures he gave between 1907 and 1911 at the University of Geneva. His views revolutionized the study of language and inaugurated modern linguistics. The theory also profoundly influenced other disciplines, especially anthropology, sociology, and literary criticism. The central tenet of structuralism is that the phenomena of human life, whether language or media, are not intelligible except through their network of relationships, making the sign and the system (or structure) in which the sign is embedded primary concepts. As such, a sign -- for instance, a word -- gets its meaning only in relation to or in contrast with other signs in a system of signs.
In general, the signifier and the signified are the components of the sign, itself formed by the associative link between the signifier and signified. Even with these two components, however, signs can exist only in opposition to other signs. That is, signs are created by their value relationships with other signs. The contrasts that form between signs of the same nature in a network of relationships is how signs derive their meaning. As the translator of Saussure's Course in General Linguistics, Roy Harris, puts it:
"The essential feature of Saussure's linguistic sign is that, being intrinsically arbitrary, it can be identified only by contrast with coexisting signs of the same nature, which together constitute a structured system" (p. x).
In Saussure's theory of linguistics, the signifier is the sound and the signified is the thought. The linguistic sign is neither conceptual nor phonic, neither thought nor sound. Rather, it is the whole of the link that unites sound and idea, signifier and signified. The properties of the sign are by nature abstract, not concrete. Saussure: "A sign is not a link between a thing and a name, but between a concept and a sound pattern" (Course, p. 66).

2 LEXICON
At least two other terms are used for signifier and signified:
signifier = signal = signifiant
signified = signification = signifie

3 SIGN VS. SYMBOL
Saussure choose the term "sign" over "symbol" because the latter implies motivation. For Saussure, the sign is arbitrary. Virtually all signs, Saussure maintains, have only arbitrarily ascribed meanings. Since Saussure, this notion has been taken as axiomatic in Western linguistics and philosophy.

4 MISTAKES
A common mistake is to construe the signifier and the sign as the same thing. In my view, another common mistake, perhaps related to the first, is to speak of a signifier without a signified or a sign, or to speak of a signified without a signifer or a sign. Used in reference to Saussure's original  formulations, both locutions are nonsensical. In language, a lone signifier would be an utterly meaningless sound or concatenation of sounds. But it is even more absurd to speak of a signified without signifier or sign: It would, I believe, have to be a sort of half thought, something never thought before, a thought that exists solely outside the domain of language, a fleeting, private, chaotic thought that makes no sense even to the thinker -- an unthought. Another mistake is to endow a sign with meaning outside the presence of other signs. Except as part of the whole system, signs do not and cannot exist.

5 EXPANSION BEYOND LANGUAGE
Saussure provides an explicit basis for the expansion of his science of signs beyond linguistics: "It is possible," he says, "to conceive of a science which studies the role of signs as part of social life. ... We shall call it semiology. It would investigate the nature of signs and the laws governing them. Since it does not yet exist, one cannot say for certain that it will exist. But it has a right to exist, a place ready for it in advance."
Roland Barthes is one scholar who took Saussure's counsel to heart. He helped found the modern science of semiology, applying structuralism to the "myths" he saw all around him: media, fashion, art, photography, architecture, and especially literature. For Barthes, "myth is a system of communication." It is a "message," a "mode of signification," a "form" (Mythologies, p. 109). With a plethora of complexities and nuances, Barthes extends Saussure's structuralism and applies it to myth as follows:
"Myth is a peculiar system, in that it is constructed from a semiological chain which existed before it: it is a second-order semiological system. That which is a sign (namely the associative total of a concept and an image) in the first system, becomes a mere signifier in the second. We must here recall that the materials of mythical speech (the language itself, photography, painting, posters, rituals, objects, etc.), however different at the start, are reduced to a pure signifying function as soon as they are caught by myth" (Mythologies, p. 114).
Because of the complexities and nuances of Barthes's semiology, I will stop here and let you pick up the strand for yourself by reading the highly informative chapter "Myth Today" in Mythologies.

6 A FINAL WORD: THE INDETERMINANCY OF MEANING
 Regardless of how linguistic signs (and perhaps other signs, too) are analyzed, meaning may in fact be unrecoverable, both to the analyst and to the participants in an exchange of signs. It is my belief that meaning is indeed ultimately indeterminate, a position that bodes well with what very well be a fact of language. With respect to indeterminacy, some linguists, postmodern theorists, and analytic philosophers seem to be in agreement. Brown and Yule, both of whom are linguists, write that "the perception and interpretation of each text is essentially subjective."
The postmodern theorists, meantime, hold that every decoding is another encoding. Jacques Derrida, for example, maintains that the possibility of interpretation and reinterpretation is endless, with meaning getting any provisional significance only from speaker, hearer, or observer: Meaning is necessarily projection. Bakhtin, too, says "the interpretation of symbolic structures is forced into an infinity of symbolic contextual meanings and therefore it cannot be scientific in the way precise sciences are scientific."
Both Bakhtin's and Derrida's views are surprisingly not unlike those of W. V. O. Quine's in "The Indeterminacy of Translation," where Quine argued that "the totality of subjects' behavior leaves it indeterminate whether one translation of their sayings or another is correct."
Wittgenstein pays homage to the indeterminacy of meaning as well: "Any interpretation still hangs in the air along with what it interprets, and cannot give it any support. Interpretations by themselves do not determine meaning."

7 REFERENCES
Roland Barthes, Mythologies, trans. Annette Lavers (New York: Hill and Wang, 1972).
Ferdinand de Saussure, Course in General Linguistics, trans. Roy Harris (La Salle, Ill.: Open Court, 1983).
See also Roland Barthes's Elements of Semiology.

8 RELATED
Philosophy of Language Questions and Answers
Pragmatic Accounts of Communication



 

White Papers
|  Linguistics
|  Critical Theory 
|  Discourse Analysis 
|  SEO

Copyright ÂŠ 1995-2016
Steve Hoenisch and Criticism.Com. All rights reserved. Site Map






















Jacques Alexandre Benedicte de Saussure (1892 - 1969)  - Genealogy


























Please wait.
loading...





 















 























               People
               


              Projects
              


              Discussions
              


              Surnames
              










Log In 





Email:



Password:



Log In

Don't know your password?


Log In with Facebook





Join - It's Free










Home
People
Projects
Genealogy


DNA Tests











    Geni requires JavaScript! Please enable JavaScript in your browser's settings to use this part of Geni.
  






Join the world's largest family tree




Gender


Male

Female



First Name





Last Name





Email




                never shared, never spammed
              





Start My Family Tree!
          or Cancel












Jacques Alexandre Benedicte de Saussure


‹ Back to de Saussure surname







Is your surname de Saussure?

      Research the de Saussure family
    

Start your family tree now





Jacques Alexandre Benedicte de Saussure's Geni Profile





Contact profile manager



View family tree






Share your family tree and photos with the people you know and love



        Build your family tree online      

        Share photos and videos      

        Smart Matching™ technology      

Free! 


Get Started





Share












Tweet This



















Jacques Alexandre Benedicte de Saussure


Birthdate:

December 21, 1892
                (76)
              


Birthplace:

Switzerland












Death:


    January 18, 1969
  
  
  (76)


  
  Switzerland










                Immediate Family:
              

Son of Ferdinand Mongin de Saussure and Marie de Saussure 
Father of Claude Raymond Ferdinand de Saussure 







Managed by:


                  Private User
                


Last Updated:

November 6, 2014




View Complete Profile








                  
            Matching family tree profiles for Jacques Alexandre Benedicte de Saussure
          
              


















Jacques De Saussure in MyHeritage family trees (Famille Georg originaire du Hannovre)              











Jacques De Saussure



Collection:
MyHeritage family trees 


Site name:
Famille Georg originaire du Hannovre 


Site manager:
Olivier Georg 


Parents: 
Ferdinand de Saussure, Marie de Saussure (born Faesch)  


Partner: 
<Private> de Saussure (born de Bonstetten)  


Child: 
<Private> de Weck (born de Saussure)  






      View the Record
    









Jacques De Saussure in FamilySearch Family Tree              











Jacques De Saussure



Collection:
FamilySearch Family Tree 


Birth: 
1892 -  


Death: 
1969  


Parents: 
Ferdinand Mongin De Saussure, Marie Faesch  


Wife: 
Marguerite De Bonstetten  


Brother: 
Raymond De Saussure  






      View the Record
    









Jacques De Saussure in MyHeritage family trees (Georg)              











Jacques De Saussure



Collection:
MyHeritage family trees 


Site name:
Georg 


Site manager:
Olivier Georg 


Parents: 
Ferdinand de Saussure, Marie de Saussure (née Faesch)  


Partner: 
<Private> de Saussure (née de Bonstetten)  


Child: 
<Private> de Weck (née de Saussure)  






      View the Record
    
















view all
Immediate Family









Claude Raymond Ferdinand de Saus...
son







Ferdinand Mongin de Saussure
father







Marie de Saussure
mother






















view all
Jacques Alexandre Benedicte de Saussure's Timeline





    
      1892
    
  

December 21, 1892



Birth of Jacques

Switzerland






    
      1920
    
  

January 1, 1920
Age 27



Birth of Claude Raymond Ferdinand de Saussure

Switzerland






    
      1969
    
  

January 18, 1969
Age 76



Death of Jacques

Switzerland






    
      ????
    
  





Burial of Jacques















Genealogy Directory:

A
B
C
D
E
F
G
H
I
J
K
L
M
N
O
P
Q
R
S
T
U
V
W
X
Y
Z












      app024

© 2017 Geni.comAboutDirectorySurnameTermsPrivacyBlogWikiWorld Family TreeHelp

Follow UsBe a Fan




English (US)  
		
		    eesti  
		
		    Svenska  
		
		    Español (España)  
		
		    Français  
		
		    עברית  
		
		    Norsk (bokmål)  
		
		    dansk  
		
		    Nederlands  
		
		    Deutsch  
		
		
		
				
		      »















